yes i know i have a shopping addiction - but soon enough it will come to a halt - a MAJOR halt - like NO more purchases for 12 months - yes 12 months - i'm dedicating myself that after October i will not purchase anything that is not a necessity and pay off all my credit cards! -- gonna be hard, but it's a life changing decision you will learn more about!
And forgive each others ghosts
His voice strong, its echo vast ….
Sweetness, come to Momma.
So today is just about more reading and getting through the reading...and more reading and more reading and more reading....oh and completing the reading...
It has attracted the expertise of specialist teachers. It has created employment. It has brought a dynamic perspective to the Conservatorium’s work and has enriched the cultural fabric not only of Wollongong but NSW, Australia and other countries.
The other reason this story received top billing was what the image above also symbolised for the fete goers and soca lovers. This appeared to be Kamla Rani’s public endorsement of Double M for major prizes at Soca Monarch and within seconds of entering the stage the talk went around the Hasely Crawford Stadium that Montano had to indeed still be in the government’s pocket. The Machel Hate and the Iwer Support became renewed and MMHD would spend the rest of this week battling not just his own demons about winning the competition but the spirit of the Vengeance of Moko that so many of the Carnival population would feel was his just due to publicly aligning himself with the government. Many asked, “who is the pimp in that relationship: Machel or Kamla?”
* The cover (referred to by AppleCheeks as an “envelope cover” is made of PUL, which is waterproof.
I think I once read that, during Hollywood's golden era, film directors asked costume designers to create luxe underclothes for their leading ladies. Even though the garments would never be seen, the idea was that the actresses would know, feel more refined or elevated, and this would somehow come across on screen.
… she dreamed through the lonely evenings, closing her eyes to create the darkness where Paradise House could take shape, embellished and enlarged day after day — with colonnades and cupolas, archways and flights of steps…. Acquisitively, from photographs and drawings in history books, she added one detail after another. That will do for Paradise House, was an obsessive formula which became a daily habit. The white peacocks would do;… as would the cedar trees at school.”
Quick update on me and running.
It took 45 minutes for the firemen to rescue Moses by drilling holes around the plastic flap.
At this point, Scott and I were convinced we had to look like someone famous in India. If you ever watch Bollywood movies or music videos, pay attention to the people in the background; you’ll notice that a good ¾ of them are white. We were convinced that we must look like two of the more famous white actors and actresses in the area.
La Pagode de Chanteloup was built in 1775 and is located in the midst of the beautiful chateaus of the Loire Valley in France. It is 44 meters tall and includes a mahogany staircase inside. Built by the Duke of Choiseul after his exile from the French Court, the pagoda, dubbed the "Friendship Monument", was built as a token of his gratitude towards his loyal friends who stood by him.
The other day I went to Walgreens to shop. I looked up at the cashier, and couldn’t help but notice the loop around her nostrils. I could see into her nose, something that wasn’t exactly pretty. And why were they allowing her to greet customers like that?
on Easter eve
First I visit the elderly retired couple next door. The husband, a former anthropology professor, answers the door, and it’s obvious from his stooped posture and confused expression that he’s had more lucid days. I tell him I’m here to check his senses.
when he wakes up, it's straight.
#5 - "Eye of the Beholder" - I feel so sad for contemporary audiences that must, in their cynicism, work overtime to stay one step ahead of creators. Better to relax and let small jewels like this TZ stunner unspool and leave their mark. Douglas Heyes turns in the series' finest example of direction that is so stylized as to dupe us into thinking it's not playing keep-away. And Maxine Stuart's viola of a voice draws us into her private world of darkness. If forced to show someone only one episode that summarizes the series, I might choose this.
I doubt whether FB has, or is likely to have, a literature in the classic sense but I can imagine material produced or introduced there entering the literary bloodstream at some level. It is, after all, performative language that is aware of itself as some kind of shape. Having a quick mind - which has its disadvantages as well as advantages - I have enjoyed composing verse almost instantaneously. The verse had to have the same standards as poetry. In some respects FB has been a poetic scratching-post and may yet generate a new line in my writing.
Harmony is produced by its Principle, is controlled by it and abides with it. Divine Principle is the Life of man. Man’s happiness is not, therefore, at the disposal of physical sense. Truth is not contaminated by error. Harmony in man is as beautiful as in music, and discord is unnatural, unreal.
Elemental is highlighted as the November exhibition on the Virtual TART site, an art website organized by artist Dale Copeland and based in New Zealand. You can see the exhibition only during the month of November by clicking here.
First thing, was the mold on the corner of the ceiling, under the roof leak. I know, you're supposed to fix the roof leak first! Well Jim is an Olde Yankee, and they never ask for help. He has worked on that section of roof 2 or 3 times now, and it still leaks. He can't fix the ceiling till the roof stops leaking, and it's winter and dangerous, etc. I was going to bleach it. But the more I thought of bleaching over my head, the less appealing that sounded. So I covered it with plastic (on a slant, so any new drips would drain off) and I covered the plastic with a white sheet. Clever? (slipshod, I know.)
As part of a growing need for youth participation in the decision-making process and policy formulation around children’s broadcasting, Bush Radio initiated a conference which would tackle these issues and also feed into this debate.
Obtained from Doctors Commons in London, from the Archbishop of Canterbury or his representative. The difference between this and an Ordinary licence was that it granted the right of the couple to marry at any convenient time or place. All other requirements were the same (something that is frequently left out of the details in Romance Novels). Names of both parties were given at the time of the application, you couldn’t fill them in later. In 1808, a Stamp Duty was imposed on the actual paper, vellum or parchment the licence was printed upon, of £4. In 1815, the duty increased to £5.
STARS is my debut. It is a 95,000 words YA novel.
hours went by, and as my contractions started to get better, I told the nurse, and my hopes got higher. she then put a cathiter in during a contraction, the second she put it in, my water broke, and minutes later my son was born, and my world came crashing down around me.
Emma Walker, Chief Executive of Craft Scotland said: “I am absolutely delighted to announce that Craft Scotland will be participating in not one, but two SOFA events over the next twelve months. The shows provide us with an incredible opportunity to promote Scottish craft to an enthusiastic collector market and to support the selected makers in strengthening their connections with new and existing buyers.
The silliest alternative use for condoms was suggested to me by a tourist from Birmingham, a city in England renowned for inhabitants who talk mildly amusing twaddle. He said they’d be a vital accessory in a naturist resort.
TODAY’S VERSE
As we go through our expenses for the wedding, I can’t help but wonder how awesome we’d be on one of those shows… how much “entertainment value” we’d bring to one of those shows. Can you imagine me, D, my friends and family and their caravan of crazy on “Say Yes To The Dress” or BrideZilla? They’d have a field day!! I absolutely REFUSE to consider “BrideZilla”, because I refuse to stoop to the level of b!tchiness required to make a successful episode of that show.
and did not use Kashmiri chili powder and also used milk instead of cream. May be good as party dish, try some time. I fried paneer; if you don’t want you can skip that part. You can either fry the onion with ginger and garlic and green chilies, or boil the onion with water and grind into paste and then fry onion paste with ginger, garlic and green chili. I did the former step. Here goes the recipe.
The odds against the Red Sea parting seem so great as to be impossible. And it seems against Nature. But (with a slight geographical adjustment – it’s not really the Red Sea itself) the impossible becomes merely a rarity. What seemed impossible becomes unlikely but possible.
Repeat with remaining dough and pretzels.
Other stories say that Chhepu was one among three brothers. One of them was the much better known, Garuda, king of the birds and enemy of snakes, who usually appears in human form with the head of an eagle; the other, Hitimanga, was probably a water god.
In America, what would happen if Obama fell? I mean not through an assassin's bullet, what if he fell politically, through impeachment or just by being booted out? Could America guarantee the safety of its white population then? I doubt anyone is sure.
The encyclopedia describes Albanians as “mountain people” and says the nation descended in Macedonia together with the Ottoman Empire in the 16th century.
Now I live in Pennsylvania and I will not go near the shore or anywhere else on Memorial Day weekend. Yesterday we had a very laid back "party" with good friends and good food.
Instead the accompanying commentary offers new trends up for your consideration, rather than ramming them down your throat with the bullying tone of the "buy now or forever be unfashionable" rhetoric that is so prevalent in some UK publications. How refreshing to see mood boards spread out like visual smorgasbords of ideas and inspiration from which you are invited to choose at leisure, rather than pressured to consume.
Well. It is certainly interesting to know who else you’re querying, but now I feel like you haven’t done enough research to know that I’m not her.
9/15: Washington, DC @ Black Cat
i am just clay – without form or shape
Zishaan ’ZuZu’ Shafi
4) To carnal saints and babes who were members of the Body of Christ.
This brings up an important issue regarding Hee’s wife. Kong Hee loves his wife Sun Hee (and fellow pastor at his church).
I’m not sure if I’m going to be live tweeting or not. I usually like to watch Game of Thrones live (no commercials) and then watch TGW right after (to fast forward the commercials!) Plus, when you live tweet, sometimes you miss things and I hate that. But I do love watching it live with my peeps. So I will let you know.
I was feeling extremely happy and on a bit of a high, and while seeing the events at the end impacted it a little (see yesterday’s post) I still felt pretty awesome and feel good today.
I loved it, and as an adult, I asked if I could have it even though it was chipped a bit.
11/23 Clarkston, WA The Grange
This afternoon I was walking along the beach by myself, just enjoying the peace and tranquility. I came to a small road that wound its way through a few rows of small cottages, so I decided to wander along and have a look at them.
I applaud the people standing up for what they believe in. We all need to become more involved and offer our support when we can. If we don’t, this may be one of those movements that is over before it really gets started.
Prior to Peter Case forming The Plimsouls, he was part of two other influential mid-to-late ’70s bands with Paul Collins – The Nerves and The Breakaways (Paul would later go on to form his own highly-respected group, The Beat). Both Peter and Paul have enjoyed successful solo careers on record and on the road, but this spring they’ll once again be reunited for a very special North American tour. The two frontmen (along with bassist Timm Buechler and drummer Amos Pitsch) will be performing classic numbers by their bands, The Nerves and The Breakaways, as well as material by The Plimsouls and The Beat. For fans of energetic live performances, visceral rock & roll, and raucous, hook-laden songs that draw as much from the golden age of ’60s pop as they do from punk, these shows should prove to be nothing short of nirvana.
I walked the paths of those misused,
My mind is racing now,
We went to a few garage sales on Friday but skipped the auction. Just too much going on and we really do not need the merchandise. We have plenty for our next sale, which will be at the little Shelton Suburb called Matlock. Just a wide spot in the road really but they have “The Old Timer’s Fair” every year and it attracts thousands of visitors. My sister, Dixie has been setting up her antiques and collectables booth for many years and managed to procure a space for us. It should be a lot of fun.
The federal Controlled Substances Act does not differentiate between marijuana and hemp, said Barbara Carreno, a DEA spokeswoman. As a result, “we would not approve applications to grow hemp because it is marijuana,” she said.
I did really well at first... until Manning's bedtime arrived. I called Dee-Dee (my mom) and told her over and over how to do his bedtime routine, how to work the video monitor, etc. I finally stopped calling when she threatened me with my life and reminded me that she had raised me and Molli. So, I stopped calling and assumed all was going smoothly until I felt my phone vibrating in the middle of the rehearsal. I ran outside to return the call to find that they could not get the video monitor to turn on.... Panic set in. After talking them through it, we finally got it working and all went totally fine. However, I didn't sleep a wink. I worry an unhealthy amount, I know. No need to tell me....
Product footprinting is expensive and 'upstream' carbon reduction mandates are not happening outside the EU.
This schedule has been going on for awhile, and to say we are sometimes grumpy about it, is an understatement. He is stressed out with studying, pressure of grades and doing well, and being tired, while I am tired of working all day and coming home to, well, nothing. We have both been feeling very lonely lately, and the other day we had a dumb argument over something stupid (like most couples right?) We had just snapped.
I am a writer, speaker and book mentor who took a long path to publication. Ten years spent in obscurity. Years and miles of unpublished words. I‘m the poster child for Malcolm Gladwell’s Outliers, where he shares the secret of “genius.” (Here’s the unglamorous truth: Genius comes from 10,000 hours of practice.) So I wrote my 10,000 hours, then started finding success in small venues–regional magazines, a local paper, then national magazines. Be sure to visit Mary on her blog www.MaryDeMuth.com
2010.09.07 Iraq Baghdad 1 0 A TV anchor who tried to end sectarian violence is shot outside his home by a sectarian faction.
What gives you your nationality?
An old, bold man who carries a huge bag. His robe is open and shows his huge belly. Sometimes he holds a Chinese fan (uchiwa) in his hand. Many illustrations show him resting on his huge bag. He is very often represented in Bizen Pottery.
I took a photograph of this now ordinary waterfront from the Ferry across the Mersey in a raging storm but it shows clearly how it has been ruined by non-descript buildings.
This actually turns out to work against the vendors’ best financial interests (see below). And it clearly holds back the state of the practice — again, just imagine if Apple would have had to come up with all the apps that are currently available for their phones…
03. 'Sputin
Once and for all, I’m just curious, Mom. I’m not scared of the men, the questions, or the answers.
Christmas isn’t just part of a series of holidays, any more than Hanukkah is only Jewish folklore, to be entertained but not revered. These are measurements of the spiritual journeys of millions of people, not to be confused with the department store version that has been sold as something real. To shelve the individual importance of any of these observances in favor of a generic phrase that satisfies those to whom the days matter the least is ludicrous. Worse than that, it means we are turning away from what is precious, to something that, by its very nature, has no meaning. Even if the point of your celebration is the winter solstice, call it by name. Let us at least be clear.
Ashley De La Rosa, Right Through You – I like Ashley; she’s cute and spunky. And I thought she sounded really good singing this song. She’s a pop rocker, and I think she does that well. I put her on my list of singers to vote for.
A few days later, I received a phone call from Rothman. They were asking me to come in for an interview. Now, I don’t know what happened, but it was like I was revived. Literally. I went from feeling down in the dumps — borderline depressed to almost back to my old self. I was still in a lot of pain but it was almost like something ‘clicked’ into my brain that reminded me, “Life goes on. Death is a part of life. A very small part. We will all experience moments of despair and great pain. We have two options when we reach one of these terrible ‘speed bumps‘ in our lives. We can either sit around feeling sorry for ourselves, or we can move on with our life. Yes, it is okay to be sad, but we shouldn’t let our sadness define our life.” I knew I would always love and miss Harley, but I also knew she was no longer in pain.
The next half of the book is literally blah blah blah: let’s film Katniss visiting people in hospitals and…. oh wait, an attack where she can shoot down hovercrafts! Let’s take her to District 2 to chill while the Capitol stronghold there is seized and, oh wait, Katniss steps out into battle to be a star again. Gale loves her, but she doesn’t seem to love anyone. Instead, she loves being cared for and babied. Some heroine.
The composition featured here, “Saint Anne’s Reel,” started out as a French Canadian fiddle tune and has since spread far and wide. I used to think people knew it in New England because it’s a staple of contra dancing, but I’ve since run into it all over the place.
The essential nature of the Qur’anic “revelation,” as understood by Muslims, was elaborated in 1891 by Theodore Nöldeke (whose seminal 1860 Geschichte des Qorans remains a vital tool for Qur’anic research): “To the faith of the Muslims…the Koran is the word of God, and such also is the claim which the book itself advances…” And to this day, as the contemporary Qur’anic scholar Ibn Warraq notes, for all believing Muslims, and not merely “fundamentalists, ” the Qur’an remains Allah’s “uncreated” words, “…valid for all times and places; its ideals are, according to all Muslims, absolutely true and beyond any criticism.”
But it keeps you in the kitchen and takes up a lot of time.
Ok, so here is one way you can mess this up: not having a griddle or any pans suitable for pancake making. This saucepan made flipping a little more difficult than expected (Carolyn and I were not in either of our home kitchens and had to make due).
I hope you all have a good couple of weeks and I will report in soon. I have 2 mini albums to make and I have just finished 2 mini's for friends in America. Kelli and her daughter. I will post pictures when I can get them taken. I need to get them posted this week sometime.
These were the rocking and rolling days of the early to mid 90′s when there were jobs available more or less for the asking. Once I was established in a career track, she and I sat down and crunched some numbers, and came to the conclusion that it would cost more than she could make in a week if we put the kids all in daycare. Therefore, it was as much an economic decision as a personal preference that she stayed home with them. She didn’t WANT to be a working mom, she wanted to be a stay at home mom. I was all for that, since that’s what I grew up with, and saw what some of my peers with two working parents had to go through.
j...jjjjjjjjjj???? (hands out like we're confused) Hang your bottoms down down, hang your bottoms down, some letters stand real tall (hands on head) some sit on the line (hands on hips) and some hang their bottoms down down (shake ourselves down)."
Recent studies show that more people are becoming visually inclined as opposed to anything else. Every day we view things in our environment, and photography allows us to capture those images. These are things to keep in mind when deciding the best digital camera to buy, it’s all about knowing which kind of digital camera you need.
How much new music do you find reaching your inbox?
Tonight was sweet; very sweet. Bare with me while I feed myself some "feel-good".
And just a few doors down Fossgate from Spring Espresso is the best cup of tea I had had in quite some time. Now, I do like my tea strong, and the house blend from the Hairy Fig really gave me the afternoon kick I needed. Along with some freshly-baked lemon and coconut cake, this was the afternoon tea I’d been looking for.
Having just finished one month as visiting faculty at the School of Management at the Indian Institute of Technology-Bombay, I appreciate more than ever the elusiveness of talking about a setting as complex as India. With over a billion residents, various ethnic and religious groups, and over 20 distinct languages, there is seldom, if ever, such a thing as "India". When it comes to talking about India, context, nuance and focus are central; generalizations are often misguided at best, misleading at worst. I was reminded of this in reading an article in The Economist on brands and counterfeiting in China. Entitled "Pro Logo: Brands in China" (January 14, 2012), the focus of the article being the assertion that "Chinese consumers are falling out of love with fakes".
The borders are all hand colored--I love the airbrush attachment, but hand coloring gets a certain pop between light and shadow that I haven't quite managed yet in my airbrushing. The white elements were done with the opaque white.
"You understand what I mean about it being harder because it's been more frequent? It's not like I'm going to spank you this hard if you brat again in the future. But this time it's built up."
Before starting our art classes using the book Discovering Great Artists, I was dubious about much of what we call "modern art". However, I have come to appreciate much of the art we have been looking at, mainly for the art itself. I don't want to delve too deeply into the hidden meanings of the pieces, or into the artist's lives themselves, I am simply trying to enjoy the art for itself. In the case of Mondrian and Matisse, I have enjoyed their work and see it as more in the category of "design." I'm not sure if these waffly thoughts are making much sense to anyone - but basically, we have enjoyed having a go at replicating these artists' paintings or just using them as inspiration to have a go ourselves. We are also enjoying recognising Mondrian designs everywhere we go! Even my brother's new business cards are based on a Mondrian design!
Here are the pictures of the album but be sure to check out the video for a more in depth description of how I created this album.
We can even say that the perpetrators are generally committing their acts in the full light of day, as they speak quite openly about their vision for the world.
1) They make funny little noises at the birds.
06 Big Time Woman
Must Read
The ones that you made fly,
So… sorry, man. My bad.
*A staple ingredient in homemade bread
--Stan Higley
A fraction of a second before he shoved his blade, the Sith deactivated both of his weapons, leaving Ken with nothing to shove against. The sudden lack of resistance caused Ken to overstep and the Sith warrior threw his weight into him, rolling bodily across his exposed back. Ken’s mind raced with the possibilities of his next moves, but it was already over. He heard the Sith’s boots hit the carpet and the snap-hiss of a lightsaber’s ignition accompanied with a pain so intense it roared through his every sense. He felt his hand go numb, the fingers falling open and his weapon rolling from his grasp.
Day 39, Grief Journal
I do love the digi, I can colour her time and time and time again... and Im planning on so be warned!!! I can see her cropping up time and time again now! I coloured her with copics and Spectrum Noirs (I'm getting used to them now! LOL!)
What many women don’t realise is that there’s a level of attractiveness which is “good enough”. Which is to say, good enough for ninety per cent of heterosexual men aged 16-30 to jump all over you if you ask them politely. If you’re already at that level, there’s not much point getting a nose job to satisfy the remaining ten per cent. It’s better to work on other things, like your sense of humour and your cooking. Or why not learn to play the harmonica? I’ve always thought that little organ looks quite fetching in a woman’s mouth.
I have already made a start on my next project, a blanket for Benny. The yarn is ready and waiting and I just have to decide on the exact design. But more on that when the plans are in place. Finally, I couldn’t leave you today without showing you the seeds the boys planted last week. The sunflowers are huge! They need potting on and that will be a job for the boys in the morning. Thankfully, a strawberry seed has come up for each of them. Just one though which I’m a bit disappointed about. Still, we have lots more things to plant tomorow. Here’s hoping for a drier day.
and the whole shebang went into the deep freeze for the night. Today I unmolded the cake and it was this nice, sturdy wheel thingy. Very nice. Then I started on the last (TYG!) step, the...
Today’s recipe is dedicated to my new friend Elisa who has just given birth a month early to a healthy little boy. Elisa, as I recently discovered, is mad for Houmus having spent the last 10 years or so living in the UK indulging in her favourite snack. Now back in Como she’s struggling to find Houmus in the Italian supermarkets and on my recent trip back to Blighty asked if I could look for some long life houmus to bring back for her but I went one better…who needs long life when you can make this delicious fresh version in a second. The key is having a blender without which you’ll have to resort to mashing and bashing to get the same smooth finish which, as you can imagine, will considerably increase the preparation time as well as killing your arms!
that hard to believe
I wasn't about to take that chance. The memory of extracting myself from a pair of spray-ons in the BT2 changing rooms was enough. Skinning a sausage would have looked sexier. Since then my pear like curves have taken a vow of chastity - a promise that this season's denim trend has caused me to rethink. Despite my unwillingness to put out for a pair of skinnies, let alone jeggings, my quest for 'the one' remains. Boyfriend? Too fat rapper. Harem? Insta-man bits. Overalls? No John Boy. No. There's a reason why skinnies are only worn by the super thin and the super young - because they can. Do you think Kate Moss frets about possible loss of circulation in her thighs? Hardly. Fashion at its most fascist.
Pietermaritzburg - The owner of a tract of land in Winterskloof, Hilton, will approach the KwaZulu-Natal High Court on Monday to obtain a court order to stop people from invading his land in Crompton Road.
“What you do not want done to yourself, do not do to others.”
There are many household projects that involve the use of extension ladders and step ladders. For instance you may be planning to re-caulk the windows, clean the eves trough, or even make the attempt to re-shingle your own roof. Whatever the project may be, many unforeseen accidents occur just from lack of safety consideration. Safety is not just a factor that must be considered at a construction site, but even within the confines of our own homes, safety must be practiced.
printables from Christina's
Good luck to all of you and thank's for playing. Giveaway ends on November 15th.
The first recipe is a potato curry that has become a staple in our house. I was sure that I had blogged about it before but I cannot find the post so I guess I didn't. It can be spicy or mild depending on the amount of ground mustard and cayenne pepper you use. We like it spicy but not blow-your-brain hot.
A couple years back I was watching TV and a movie came on, Executive Decision. Starts with a small plane flying. You know how I like planes. The camera gets a close-up of the plane.
From Quebec comes the early ’80s stylistic touches of Malajube’s “Le Blizzard” and the organ-driven garage rock of Les Breastfeeders’ “Manteau de Froid.”
I also like this 72-inch rope of mixed chocolate, peach, mocha and white freshwater pearls. Dyed, yes, but the mix is subtle and sprightly. Size of pearl not specified, but they will, I'm guessing, be smallish (3-6mm) and that's fine for this very long scatter-strung rope, which you can wear so many ways. From Blue Nile; price, $85.
Anna: Besides Cherry Filter I’d think Yi Sung Yol would be the most realistic alternative out of those suggested. I haven’t quite managed to get into his solo stuff, but I did enjoy U&Me Blue a great deal before. I’ll keep hoping he’ll not only get on the show, but also stay there for the reasons already mentioned by rd.
I looooove the Harry Potter series,
Dearest underling of Grand Ledge,
- Application of our parallel legal system known as 'The Gestapo' must be enforced in so-called 'democratic' countries.
Hauser R, Singh NP, Chen Z, Pothier L, Altshul L. Lack of an association between environmental exposure to polychlorinated biphenyls and p,p’-DDE and DNA damage in human sperm measured using the neutral comet assay. Hum Reprod 2003; 18: 2525-2433.
Above all, the report underscores the need for improved planning and transparency, which are the two primary objectives achieved by the legislative package passed by the City Council in April. DOI deserves significant credit for conducting a thorough investigation of the allegations of a slow-down, and of other factors that may have contributed to the inadequate response to the blizzard that hit New York City on December 26th and 27th of 2010.
Some more bits of wood and plastic fell of it but it still makes a noise. Anyway if it falls to bits I will need to learn to use the bass or broken mandolin banjo I have in the cupboard and I am sure no-one is ready for that!
How does such a beauty-attuned culture evolve? You start them young. Have you noticed the children we've passed, laughing, hiding behind planters, only to leap out with a "Cou-cou!" when their friends catch up? See the four-year-old girl in a teal sheepskin coat with a fur-trimmed hood, pink and blue striped tights and little pink t-straps?
The original trilogy, set in New Orleans, can be read as a separate experience, and that story seemed complete when it ended. Those books are from the same publisher, are available, and are subtitled Prodigal Son, City of Night and Dead and Alive.
Piece of Kitchen Roll
Stand Out Dream Sequence: Again, this is one of those films where we can argue that the whole film is one long dream sequence (or not?) but one of my favorite scenes is the one where Donnie falls asleep in a movie theater while watching The Evil Dead and he ends up having a conversation with Frank, the man wearing the bunny suit. Donnie asks the man: “Why do you wear that stupid bunny suit?” and the man asks Donnie: “Why are you wearing that stupid man suit?” Then, a black hole forms on the screen of the movie theater!
The implication of the foregoing for psychology then is that insofar as they concentrate their inquiries upon 'input-output relationships' and other types of constant conjunction, psychologists will never succeed in justifying causal inferences. More reductionistic types of inquiry (e.g. psychophysiology) will be needed before the 'other', more minute, intervening events' mentioned above can be identified. Insofar as they have not had such knowledge, it is little wonder that psychologists have so far eschewed much talk of causes. It was evident to them that despite the legitimation furnished by the Humean account for a concentration on mere conjunctions of events, this could not enable more than prediction.
The latter half of the book, rather than detailing the day-to-day lives of Judith and her partner as they "don't buy it" seems to turn into a rant at consumerism as a whole. Levine complains about those in "McMansions" with "SUVs": she says that she is "enraged" at "those suburban Philadelphians in their big houses, at this moment unloading bulbs and fertilizer from their SUVs" (p. 208 - she even names and shames her neighbours - I'm not sure if they are pseudonyms, but even so, they would know!) Normally, I'd be jumping on the bandwagon right along with her. But coming from the woman who has just told us she & her partner have two houses (they spend 1/2 the year in each) and THREE cars (yes, one each PLUS an extra) I fail to see how a family inhabiting a large house and having perhaps one or two cars is so terribly evil in comparison. Then there's a whole subplot about a cell phone tower being erected in the town that didn't quite fit.
"Make a face that shows frustration or happiness. Tell about a time you felt calm or scared. What color would your heart be if it were a color? Those are just a few of the challenges players face in HeartMath’s new Wild Ride to the Heart™ game, where the first player to reach the heart at the center of the board, wins. But win or lose, the whole family will soon learn the true fun in playing Wild Ride – again and again – is because it makes you feel good in your heart."Wesley and I have had the chance to review this great game called Wild Ride to the Heart. Its designed for children ages 4 and up. It takes teaching your child feelings up to the next level. Most kids 4 and up know the basics, happy, sad, mad. But Wild Ride to the Heart helps your child learn more complex emotions like; calm, disappointment, frustration, thankfulness, etc.
Last bit of update, we are tossing around alternate travel plans for this fall. The big trip has to be scaled back to two weeks, if that. Which means just the southwest, which...sucks. We have been talking about doing Disney instead or even just taking Poppy to the beach and camping for a couple of weeks. We have to funnel some money into house repairs is what it all comes down to: finite cash flow, infinite wants and needs. But, it will all work out in the end. As long as I don't get hit by a car.
We must no longer call them enemies
"ol, ceol, craic", (a great pint, good music and wonderful fun).........let the party begin.........
Then there’s Egypt, where less than a month after President Hosni Mubarak stepped down, the military junta that replaced him, ostensibly to “protect the revolution,” inadvertently reminded us of the two revolutions we women need. After it cleared Tahrir Square of protesters, the military detained dozens of male and female activists. Tyrants oppress, beat, and torture all. We know. But these officers reserved “virginity tests” for female activists: rape disguised as a medical doctor inserting his fingers into their vaginal opening in search of hymens. (The doctor was sued and eventually acquitted in March.)
Hospital entry, if I could reach out, I’d cry for you
Matte textures although great with oil control tend to look a little dull and with over application you run the added risk of the dreaded cake face!
Last fall, my 4th grader’s class banned playing football at recess after one child fell down and hurt his arm. You might say that that isn’t too outrageous of a response, except for one fact — the boy wasn’t actually injured by playing football. He was injured after he tripped over a tree root while showing the other kids his touchdown dance. Because football motivated the dance, it was banned.
Consider joining a support group or sharing your story to comfort others.
But the Government (hurrah) was smart enough to have second thoughts and defer a decision on mandatory additions to bread.
“ My mother at times gets up past midnight and wants me to talk to her about my father. She feels happy when I tell her that her prayers will be heard soon. She tells me to visit every Baba (godman) who comes to the village.’’
We stayed at a hotel on Key Colony Beach. The one day it was slightly warm, Don enjoyed soaking in the rays while I sipped Bloody Mary's at the bar.
For you chance to enter see details on Kate's blog here and for an extra entry become a follower of my blog, place a comment under this post letting me know you are a follower and that you are here for the Kate Landers Events LLC giveaway.
Although I'm not always keen on how the girls behave, their friendship is firm, they have good hearts, they can be very funny so I give this 8/10.
For the cake stand and the footed bowl, I simply picked up a glass bowl and a decorative glass plate, also at the dollar store, and followed the same process from above. The bowl was great at Christmastime, because I displayed the christmas crayons I made for the kids in them! And now, I have a cute little nest with blue egg soaps for spring!
These surveys solely require one to reply some product or service particular questions and disclose some particulars, enabling a diligent survey taker to make a decent sum from these online surveys and support companies with the demographics a part of their market study. Just don't go overboard and join with several survey websites at one time, as you could discover your in box flooded with e-mails from them. Again, use your search engine to seek out just a few of the preferred survey web sites in the country. You possibly can still complete surveys from other nations, though your native corporations would most likely prioritize your data greater than companies abroad will.
Soon I focused on a select few careers and decided to take the leap. Writer/photographer turned out to be the most realistic (when compared to acting, writing music, finger-painting and underwater basket weaving) but it still seemed like such a long shot. But with your encouragement, I took the leap.
I let him out the gate and thank him, despite scaring the living daylights out of me, for coming so quickly.
But I digress. I present Tin Woman v2.0:
“Pev-“
I'm on a couple of panels, which you should also consider attending, including a full 45 minutes with all three of us, and another sit-down with Mike Allred.
-Did you know that the king of Jericho was a self-proclaimed religious and political divine ruler, who was a part of a series of divine rulers common to the area of Canaan known as a “son of el” or “ba-al” later associated with Baal and Ashtoreth? (historical reference article) – It’s leadership and spiritual culture allowed for a “substitute” faith and religion that would not “restrict” its followers from pursuing what they desired. Sexuality and indulgence were not only tolerated, but celebrated in this culture of Jericho and the entire region.
Moon shot out towards the sea!
Always repeating the Name.
And here is my cleaning liquid that I shook just to show you what it looks like. So don't think you've done anything wrong if your mixture separates, it's fine, it just needs a good shake. This is safe in septic tanks but not for grey water. The borax in the mix builds up as boron in the garden and that is harmful to plants. If you want to use your grey water, don't add the borax.
Not that I recall. Unless you count making Blanket tents …
As you can see, Hot Mama does have a reflective sheen because of the shimmer in it. It is also more pigmented than St. Tropez, which has a slightly more chalky formula. However, they are both quite buildable to the same amount of pigmentation. After blending, St. Tropez actually seems to be more pigmented – that could be because Hot Mama is closer to my skin tone because it’s a warmer colour. Either way, I never find that I have to build up the colour on my cheeks – a light dusting is enough for both blushes. Hot Mama gives me a more natural glow, and St. Tropez gives me nicely flushed cheeks.
Johnny Guitar (Nicholas Ray, 1954) - "It's a mad film, but its intense emotions are carefully controlled within a very rigid and powerful aesthetic framework. These oversized emotions, these bold feelings and words freighted with meaning, are straining against the boundaries of the Academy ratio frame, against the very form of the film which seeks, in vain, to hem them in. This tension is embodied in the jarring leaps between natural splendor and studio artificiality, necessitated at least in part by star Joan Crawford, a solidly artificial actress who refused to be filmed in closeup in nature. That might be a crippling limitation for a Western, except that Ray makes it into a weird virtue."
San Jose, CA
15And this is in agreement with the words of the prophets, as it is said,
So I bought Started Early, Took My Dog, ostensibly so Rachel (a.k.a. The Bird) could read it, as she's read a couple of the other Brodie books, and I found an inexpensive first edition of Case Histories so that I could start reading the series too. But I'm not very far into it yet, and I get the feeling Atkinson deserves more than my customary one-line largely-sight-unseen plot summary (Book Glutton, I know you're an Atkinson fan, so feel free to enlighten/elaborate in the comments). So... yeah. Really, this post is even more pointless than usual.
Xu Guan only let the thought nag at him for a moment. He needed a pry bar to break open the padlock. The shed was lined by 55 gallon drums along one outer wall and a tangled mess of scrap on the opposite side. Xu Guan hunted through the scrap for a piece of steel that could be used to break open the lock. He cast aside several pieces of junk until he came across a rusted shovel with a broken handle. Perhaps the handle could be used as a pry bar. Xu Guan ran around to the building’s door once again. The handle was too large, but the shovel gave Xu Guan another idea.
The ingredient deck looked almost unnecessarily complicated by listing all the active cultures, but I grew to appreciate their attention to the scientific detail since they do claim to use all natural ingredients. But, I noticed that they listed the fruit on the bottom as just “strawberries”…
Similarly, last night, when I went to see My Week with Marilyn,, my mind went off wandering, despite the fact that I found the film quite enchanting. Even though I loved every minute of it - especially its insight into the foolishness of men and the way that good looks are a mixed blessing, a weapon handed to a woman, without any accompanying instruction, and removed from her just as she is beginning to understand the exact nature of her dangerous power - the whole thing was spoilt by the niggling fact that over the door of the pub called The Dog and Duck, where one of the main characters is housed for the film's duration, the sign advertising accommodation is misspelt.
that I would only put my hair in a ponytail if it was long
With my acquiescence's, my silence, and the obedience which would never be enough.....
At last, we are no longer in limbo, we know when things are happening.
I am shutting stuff down for the time being. Just need a break, and think I need my head to shut off. Might just be for summer. maybe longer. we'll see.
For a long time now I’ve developed a short list of martial arts I had wanted to try. What I’m hoping is that my “retirement” art is on this list. Generally speaking I’m looking for an art that I can spend the next 10 – 15 years in.
Linger in the cold night air
Some suggestions per Flourishing Life
We were going out alot in the company of the other man but we would just be ourselves.
What about alien abductions and cattle mutilations? After Dawn Lucifer rebelled against Yahweh’s Throne of Authority, others followed. A group of angels from the Celestial Order abandoned their posts in heaven and materialized on earth so that they can mate with humans. Their offspring were the Nephilim. During the Global Flood, these fallen angels did not perish because they simply shed their human vessels and returned to the spirit realm and became spirits again. Upon their return, Yahweh took away some of their powers, including the ability to materialize. Satan knows science is the key to unlocking his chains. Anything mankind envisions and then becomes reality, that is Satan’s inspiration. Guess what is on his agenda? Newer and stronger hybrids - from bringing back the Nephilim to human-animal hybrids. Put two and two together, can you see why they are interested in reproductive science? The Devil and his human confederates are getting their arsenals ready – the elite human army with advanced weaponary and genetic manipulation will gather to make war with the LORD’s Army. Points #6: Genetic manipulation is used by Satan to create super soldiers for Armageddon.
In the last year or so, I watched all of Jeeves and Wooster, starring the delightful Fry and Laurie. It should be noted that I am in love with both Stephen Fry and Hugh Laurie, and therefore also in love with P.G. Wodehouse. Wodehouse is also one of Christopher Hitchens’ favorites, so there’s that connection as well. I did really enjoy the book, though I must say that I’m not sure I enjoyed it more than watching Jeeves and Wooster. I think it does the show great credit that there was nothing jarring at all about reading the books, I felt like I’d already done so.
But receiving the news was hard. Even though we knew it was the right call to make, it wasn't what she wanted. At one point last week she and I sat together and we both cried. I sat down and wrote her a letter reminding her that we supported her and loved her, and that-- in spite of how she felt-- God still has a plan for her life. And it's the best plan.
Radiating through these eyes
Here are links to the stories in the Post's forensics package:
The greatest "overcomer" of brain anomolies is inherit in the brains ability to change, it's plasticity Most of these kids are going to grow up and become contributing, possibly in outstanding ways, of society. Thomas Edison's mother was told he was "too scattered to learn" by a teacher, so she took him home and schooled him there.
Grant-back. : This is the term used to denote giving the licensor rights to the improvements made by the licensee on the licensed technology. If the licensee grants improvements back to the licensor, the scope of such improvements requires clear definition in this section. It usually parallel the “ licensed improvements “ and “ major improvements “ definition.
-dueling 18 seconds/Daniel Bryan chants! Wow!
After mass, all three hours of it, we were given a tour of the local village of Luzango. It's a small rural village beside the school and the poverty was so clear . We visited the midwifes house, the teachers dwellings and Pastor marias house. The houses were, by and large, simple one roomed dwellings with little to no furniture. Some were mud huts and some were made of brick. The villagers all grew crops such as papaya, pineapple, bananas and coffee sometimes to sell but often just to survive on. Most of them also kept a few chickens or goats.
Bean is silly and sits in room with no phone signal - I have to wait outside for 90 mins.
Striped Cavern tomato - 18
San Jacinto – yellow eagle flies down from the sun -
Different stylings
I wonder what it feels like to be a billionaire.
Having the opportunity to be the first picking the list was not very easy for me when I realized that my favorite indie musicians mostly debuted after 2004. However, I managed to come up with those who also became my favorite in the past years.
But where is all this headed? Beckett’s characters notoriously fail to reach an end, whether it be Mercier and Camier winding up exactly where they started off from or Vladimir and Estragon who never even leave their starting spot. The question here is: Will the guy in the bed ever get out of it? As the work progresses we start to figure out what he’s doing there and who “the kindly hands that brought nutrition” belong to and it’s really not that complex. But I won’t spoil it.
Brendan liked the idea of re-skining Dragonborn as Sleestaks in my last post, so I'll expound on that idea a bit. I'm sure there have been write ups of Sleestaks and a playable race but this is specifically for 4e D&D or a simplified/hacked facsimile.
I doubt that Warren used this to get into any of the places she’s taught. But the places she’s taught have certainly used it, which shows you how even the best ideas (making sure minorities with brains aren’t arbitrarily excluded) can be ruined. This sort of thing can’t help the cause, and frankly it stinks. For just how minority free the Ivy league was 50+ years ago see the link above.
Emily
So as usual I will be pottering around on Saturday and Sunday with my good ol’ camera snapping up as many cosplayers as I can as sadly I doubt I’ll be able to take photos of the masquerade this time T___T
"Are you too sick to tell me inappropriate stories?"
My problem this week has been that I have attended two very different fairs for the first time. It is not a lot of help to you (the potential customer/happy shopper) to hear about a marvellous event that you have just missed!
Good morning all. So, I’m sipping my coffee and waiting to drop Wifesy off at work as I write. Today’s post will take us off the beaten path a bit. (I promise, I’ll still end with a joke.) As some of you know, I moonlight at another blog writing gig. I write for a wonderful, little, publication produced by some very dynamic thinkers in Brooklyn called, It’s Conceivable Now. The site is a hub for gay and lesbian parenting. Want to know how much IVF costs? Look no further than ICN. Want to understand surrogacy? ICN has got it covered. Want some funny parenting advice from a childless Mommy blogger? Look no further, because I write for them once a month. (lol) I love the site. I think it’s a quality thing of great importance. Their tag line is: “The Path to Parenting Isn’t Always Straight.” Indeed, indeed.
Awesome AWESOME book!
And so the tradition continues in our kitchen, amid friendly brotherly banter from spending months apart, where dough snakes wind their way through melted butter and cinnamon sugar the night before Christmas. “God bless us, everyone.”
The old ache across the shoulders,
I am back with a color challenge, I do hope you like it
I'm so in love with this product and I hope L'Occitane never stops making it. I would love it would if they made a body spray or perfume with the exact same smell as this shower oil, I would totally buy that :)
“A woman should wear perfume wherever she wants to be kissed.”
Do you think that - despite this dislike for photographers - you look well in images?
During that very stressful time, I worked on my rewrite of the "back up" book. It wasn't pretty. I was not in a good place. Stressed, anxious, scared, jaded, and yet secretly so hopeful it hurt. The rewrite absorbed all of that pain, to the point that just opening the document gives me a panic attack. Still.
So here’s our contest, open to anyone: make a video that compresses the story of a Newbery award-winning book into 90 seconds or less.
Frank Black is a really good songwriter, but I’d probably have to go with Black Sabbath. My sister always listened to the Pixies growing up, I do like them. But I have to say Sabbath.
Kohlstadt’s quote is right on the money and worth remembering. This scandal matters because we, the taxpayers, are on the hook for the loan.
There are two decent gay dance clubs in Ottawa right now – The Edge plays club hits (remixes of popular top 40 radio songs) and caters to the young, and The Flamingo (or as we call it, The Flaming O) plays house music (which has fewer recognizable ditties) and attracts a broader range of ages. I like the music and the crowd at the Flaming O, but my companions on Saturday night wanted club hits…so off to the Edge we trotted.
The institution of the Holy Eucharist is so properly the work of God than the creation of the world. That work is more worthy of God which results in His greater glory and is more profitable to men. What little profit men have derived from the created universe (although it is their own fault) can be seen by considering the sins in the world; but the Holy Eucharist, on the other hand, has been one of the principal causes of holiness of martyrs, confessors, and virgins, because it was the primary source of their courage and strength in overcoming the world, the flesh, and the devil. Moreover, the Holy Eucharist reveals much more the goodness of God. And do not be surprised that we insist time and again on the goodness of God, because the basis of all His works is His immense goodness. This is the best and surest way to philosophize about the works of God – to reduce all to His infinite goodness.
Since last blog, we have opened 2 new locations and are very excited about being in your neighborhoods!
1/2 lb andouille sausage, sliced
George: "Are you okay? Want to go to the dance with me?"
"Do you miss me yet??
I AM 'enough'.
Does this mean that McLaren has an advantage over the others? Only time, testing and racing will really answer that question. In my opinion though I don’t think there is any advantage! Any of the F1 teams have the opportunity to ‘copy’ innovations or existing parts from their competitors so would have been able to use the concepts from McLaren at any time however, so far, 3 teams have chosen to go with the step nose. After months of testing in a wind tunnel and simulations there must be some reason why this is the case and I think every F1 fan is now intrigued to see the results from testing and also what the other teams unveil! Personally I want to see what Red Bull (or should I say Adrian Newey) comes up with!
“We run a bus to most home games 17 seater.”
Meanwhile & Finally, back in The Land of Sepia..........
Great article, I may have 2-3 work husbands…
But here's what I was thinking. I don't have to wait until Lent to give up something I covet, and use that time to think about the things that are really important. And it doesn't have to be 40 days. It could be a day, a week, or even a year.
Oh...did I mention she is turning 16 while she is here?
75. Chen is a gentle person.
Maybe these aren’t earth-shattering new concepts, but good reminders for a task as large as creating a Rural Futures Institute…and frankly for anything in life.
I ask Katie what she thinks of Jon Pertwee. She says she likes him alot and thinks that Spearhead From Space was a good introduction; not too demanding and funny (and not too boring I guess. Ha ha!). She says that Pertwee is solid from the beginning and stays that way. You never worry with him, he's safe, sure and secure. She also says that where other Doctor's take a little while to warm up and tend to develop as their time on the show goes on, Pertwee hits the ground running and stays completely consistent.
"I don't know. We'll have to see. Do you remember what to do when the door opens?"
With regard to the amount of enhanced damages, less than a third of enhanced damages awards during the entire study period (both before and after Seagate) were for treble damages. In fact, most (over 70%) enhanced damages awards were for double damages or less. The mean enhancement was found to be 207%.
McKenna
but if anyone could have made that story work, it was him.
Well, I, on the other hand, have been on some different adventures, he said seriously.
After asking repeatedly for his water, and none of the adults taking him up on it, Jack finally said; "How 'bout if I go get it?" We thought that was a good idea.
Despite the efforts to smooth relations, historians are unanimous that history is not subject to goodwill agreements.
But note that all the evidence I cited only shows that the universe expanded from a hot and dense state. It does not actually tell us what happened at t=0. As we get to t=0, there are more and more disputes over what happened.
The cast does well and there are snatches of quality (no pun intended… well, maybe slightly). But this is a bit lacking in originality and cohesion, and it spends too long on minor characters who have little to do with the plot. There a few missing pick-up shots, too – the director’s or editor’s oversight. 5/10
Well, the storm has arrived, and I am screaming from within. My words will be thunder, even if they are only thunderous in my own ears.
The Township resident’s more than 15-year-old pit bull sustained bruised ribs, fluid in his lungs, severe abrasions on most his body and rope burns around his neck, said Mr. Johnson.
"Now if the sick turned out to be mine?"
22. Mark of the Devil
As I remember it, she roared and snapped and breathed fire, dragon-lady that she was, but this was the gist of what she said: I get that you know the book really well, but you didn’t follow the instructions, and following the instructions was part of the assignment too.
'NO!' I hear my poor husband cry.
Hugo-"I guess."
The Style Compass inside 1st Dib's Introspective is first-hand look at stylesetters and tastemakers and part of this rich site that "is the world's leading on-line resource for antiques, 20th century design, fine and estate jewelry, and vintage couture and designer fashion".
All we’re asking is if you could please dig deep
Clark’s not on solid ground when it comes to hidden agendas. As deputy Prime Minister and Labour’s key strategist at the 1990 election she helped perpetrate the big lie of that campaign.
I'm actually starting to wonder if he may be a little crazy. I'm hoping so, because then we'll get along just fine.
The company has said they are also working hard to bring offline video support in the near future. I love this app and does exactly what it’s intended to do. Plus it’s FREE. So if you travel a good bit, or find a news article that you don’t have time to read at that moment, use Pocket to read it later. Below is the iTunes/App Store Link.
2. Trinkets. This is really up to interpretation, but idealy something small and touristy that says something about where you live.
TORRINGTON — Heads will bow or eyes will lift to the skies. Voices will be shared aloud or be silent one-on-one communication.
March is based on the absent father from Louisa May Alcott's beloved classic book, Little Women. Mr. March is a passionate abolitionist and preacher and when the Civil War begins, he finds himself at 40 years old, leaving his home, his wife and daughters to aid the Union Army. He holds many roles during the first year of the war as he seeks to bring peace and healing to the wounded. In his letters, Mr. March finds he cannot tell his wife everything that has happened as the war is so horrible. Racism exists on both sides and March struggles with the convictions of others.
as your peace pours all around.
All kids need attention from parents. Even the most aloof teenager craves parental attention. That's one of the biggest reasons homeschooling works even among families whose parents don't have advanced degrees. They know how to give their kids the attention they need to help them succeed.
… After my parents’ marriage she took care of me when my father was determined to make a decent living for our poor family. I remember two scenes: my grandmother in the kitchen opening the pot lid from time to time for fear that the cheap ribs might burn, and warmly comforting my mother, who came from a local urban family, as she complained in tears about why she chose to follow this man. Toward me, she showed kindness. She taught me patiently with a strong rural accent the country ballads about fairies and heroes, and clumsily made toys like wood pistols to give me joy.
Love and Spring flowers to all,
All of the songs on the Assassins EP are love songs from the perspective of a presidential assassins. This was the last song I wrote for the EP, and the only one to have been written on banjo. The graphic novel “The Fatal Bullet” by Rick Geary tells the story succinctly and it’s images stay in my head whenever I think of the song. Charles Guiteau shot James A. Garfield despite having supported him in the election. Guiteau spent a significant amount of time in the Oneida Community, a religious group that had bizarre sexual practices that Guiteau would have loved to have been a part of. However, he was kind of a creep and no one wanted to have sex with him. After killing Garfield he was executed by hanging and his final words were a hymn of his own composition. This hymn went on long enough that they lost patience and killed him before he finished. “Glory, glory, glory” were his last words.
What’s the passion that drives you to get up every morning?
tristimulus appearance signals dependent on the colors in said original;
If anyone does know what the relationship consists of, they’re not telling anyone of my acquaintance. Perhaps they don’t tell anyone at all. Maybe they don’t talk, but just send the odd email or tweet. Whatever the reality, Wolfie and his pals in Paris and Brussels must be praying that he can drag Geli into the loop, without her snipping it after a day or two in order to go walkabout, while muttering about lazy Greeks and flea-bitten Spanish donkeys.
This is one of those stores with ironic letterpress cards, decorative owls, twine, striped paper straws, and notebooks for sale with tiny bikes on the cover. I would love to hate this place for being so obviously cute and vintage and campy, but I don't. Instead, I love everything about it. It's the perfect store to buy something small, like a stationary set with French words on the packaging or kitchy buttons that say "Happy Birthday! Today is your Day!" or "One Year Wiser". Even the guy behind the counter was so nice, helpful, and normal. He wrapped the present for Madeline. I could have spent some more time exploring this tiny store. Shamelessly, I'll be back.
TIP: Prepare pan of polenta and the sauce the night before. Cut polenta into large squares and quickly pan fry to warm up before eating (while warming up the sauce). If you are dairy free or would like a quicker ragu, just mix browned sausage with a jar of organic pasta sauce.
While this is happening, wash your jars in hot soapy water, then put into an oven at 140C for about 10 minutes, this will sterilise them.
Other leagues around the world do use the 3 points for a win system and some even offer 4 points for a win in an attempt to separate teams more obviously. So by moving a way from 2 points for win the UK would not be on their own. It may in fact help attract a bigger fan base in the UK by bringing ice hockey in line with football.
of every eight infections
The idea of this blog is to keep track of my running. You know – training, races, and little anecdotes on how not to get caught up in a dogs lead as the owner carelessly lets it scamper across your path at the last minute so you have no way of escaping and fall flat on your face – that sort of thing. Well today is different.
2) Secondary fermentation in glass at 72F for 10 days. Dry hop with 2 oz. Cascade pellets.
5) Add salt to taste.
One must question the quality of Allied thinking after WWII when we collectively discussed the fate of the surviving European Jews. They had just barely survived the Holocaust; yet in the smugness of a WWII victory we set the conditions for them to eventually face a new one. Nevertheless, the fact is that today the U.S. is most hated for the historical complicity, even if it inaccurately attributed solely to us.
So I digress, sorry.
The bad thing is that days, weeks and months go by, and nothing changes. What’s going on God, where are You? Have You forsaken me? What have I done wrong to deserve all this?
to create the focal points. How beautiful is that butterfly...also from
well done folks please email me at mailto:creativecraftchallenges@live.co.uk stating what you have won or if you are a top 3 and ill send out your banners and/or prize details.
June 21 Washington, DC @ 930 Club
Make a slit with a knife on top of the crust and place into baking sheet. Repeat with the rest of the dough. Preheat oven @ 185C.
1/2 tsp ground cinnamon
Song 1: Carrie Underwood “Good Girl” – Different kind of song for country, but I like it.
I have chatted online with Chris but unfortunately I never got the opportunity to meet Chris in person. She lived in the next town over from me. I followed her blog and her wonderfully creative work. Thank you to Creative Charms for your generosity!
Q: I have two standard questions that I ask my women and guys who rock interviewees. The first is a two parter, what was the first album you bought and the first concert you attended? Be honest, we don't judge.
Hmmm. You’ll have to judge for yourself.
Root adds that he was, "Class of '83 political science, pre-law" and says, "You don't get more exact or closer than that. Never met him in my life, don't know anyone who ever met him."
Enjoy my super duper cute frankie and as always if you have any questions or want instructions just leave a comment or notify me via email....
Pour enough water into pot to cover chicken and add a few teaspoons of stock (to your own personal taste)
Ram wanted to cheer me up and he took me to this place as a surprise. We went and tried out some exotic truffles and of course ordered a hot chocolate beverage. Out of their selection of truffles, I liked their Champagne truffles which were yummylicious. I ordered White Chocolate Hot Drink on that cold winter day. Ooh la la….What taste! And to top that, they serve this with a slow burner that keeps your drink warm till you finish. The whole experience gave the feeling of snuggling under a quilt cosily. And Theobroma’s white chocolate, made me want to have White Chocolate Milk more often. With the pretence of baking Peanut butter and White Chocolate cookies for my team, I bought a packet of White chocolate buttons. Shhh……don’t tell anyone….I put some in hot milk and enjoyed it, and kept indulging till it was over in less than 2 weeks. I enjoyed every last drop. It just so happened, I saw myself in the mirror just as I was finishing my last glass of chocolate milk, and saw that I had the funniest milk moustache ever. Just one of those memories that make you laugh just thinking about it.
The Managed Heart- Arlie R. Hochschild (s and p)
Heaven is a place on earth with you
When we arrived in Madurai, I couldn`t believe how different it was to Pondicherry. Madurai is a very industrialised city and pollution, mostly from the rubber industry, hangs heavy in the air, it made me feel nauseous. We found a hotel but it was bland and impersonal. A river flows through Madurai called the Vaigai and where we were staying it was absolutely filthy and heaving with all sorts of rubbish, it would be hard to believe that any fish could survive in such conditions. We only stayed one night. He had his massage, which he enjoyed but we quickly left to avoid the pollution and made our way across the southern tip of India, to visit Kerala.
As it creeps up slowly on one near.
So that all really goes back to yourself again. Work on your self, who you are as a person to know that you do not ever need a man or anyone to validate who you are as a person.
right arm around the bulge of his gun. His eyes catalogued everyone and what
If lpSecurityAttributes is NULL, the directory gets a default security descriptor. The ACLs in the default security descriptor for a directory are inherited from its parent directory.
Who knows?
Imagination is more important than knowledge. For knowledge is limited to all we now know and understand, while imagination embraces the entire world, and all there ever will be to know and understand.
As beasts of the air we humans are poorly designed and it has been all our big brains can handle to invent machines to assist our rise into the wild blue yonder. We'd do better if we could let our machines work without our cumbersome fat bottomed bodies attached to them. The U.S. military flies unmanned drone aircraft over the Mid-East from a control center in the Rocky Mountains half way around the world. That expensive flight technology like this, is driven by the needs of the military to baffle and destroy it's enemies is a crying shame. It seems useless to hope for something better, like spending a few of those hard earned bucks on the decaying infrastructure of our dilapidated twentieth century cities. Excuse me for drifting away from my theme. My question: Has the miniaturisation of our artificial intelligence and mechanical systems risen to the point where, however awkwardly, we can mimic the dream like avionics of a three month old Red-tailed hawk? Could science create a life like mechanical bird? And if the day has arrived that such a miraculous robot does fly our skies, what are the practical implications of this dream realised? I put on my investigative reporter hat and got on the case!
A mother’s arms are made of tenderness and children sleep
Eventually, the deed was done, the spider went off, under the rim of the shelf, leaving the dead fly behind. There wasn't a spider's web, there were no silver threads and I could see no nest. But I was curious to find out what would happen to the fly, why it had to be killed.
Yudhiṣṭhira now gives a dire interpretation of these severe omens: “The earth was blessed with the greatest fortune. She bore the beautiful footprints of the All-Attractive. All these horrible signs can only indicate that the earth has been cast into the deepest despair over the loss and destruction of her greatest treasure. Śrī Kṛṣṇa is no longer on Earth.”
The Mixed Bag is presented by Lee Kingcombe and Jonathan deBurca Butler evwery Thursday from 5 pm – 6.30pm
bake the cupcakes, bring the sweet treats --
Al-Qaradhawi, Al-Sudayyis, Other Prominent Arab Islamic Scholars: Kashmiri Movement Is Jihad
Twenty years ago I was sexually harassed by a professor. I don’t mean being called baby or sweetie, sexually harassed. I mean abused, molested.
Easy-peasy, eh? And in typical Sandra Strait-style, she went one better and designed a fancy new version called "HYTINGU." (Sandra, can you post where the name comes from? Inquiring minds want to know!!)
The Labour Party were little better in power, so it's not strictly party political.
But I’ll just be happy to get
I wrote a post back in January on Sexy Designer Covers. And I still stand by my thoughts and opinions in that post. But in that post – I showed everyone gorgeous covers that all had ‘cover girls’. (Possibly because the majority market the authors are aiming at are female.) But there are many more covers out there that are different and unusual that will capture my eye.
Paper strip - Very Vintage wheel (Stampin' Up) and mini Floral Border (Tim Holtz Urban Chic set)
I am tired
We decorate to remember Christmases past, our lives, our legacy, and mostly, for those of us who have embraced Christ, we decorate to honor and praise Him for coming to us—Emmanuel! We make our homes ready to receive the Christ Child, with soft music and candles burning and the sweet flickering of angel wings on an over-laden evergreen.
My two favorite characters in this book were the ghost Po and his trusty companion, Bundle. It was fun to guess if Po was a girl or a boy and if Bundle was a cat or a dog. In the end we find out, young readers will enjoy hedging their bets one way or another.
According to Ayurveda, fasting helps eliminate the toxins that accumulate in our body over a period of time. During fasting, the digestive system is given rest and the body mechanism gets corrected / healed and the toxins get eliminated.
Back with my wife in Tennessee, when one day in ‘08 she called to me,
GSM/EDGE 850/900/1800/1900
Faintly floated above,
He closes his eyes again and, tapping at his mana, opens a flood of it, unlocking a gate and letting it flow into Eliss.
PORT ELIZABETH: Elderly man attacked, assaulted and tied up in Luneville Street.
iOS 5.1 Jailbreak
Straight away I had a massive contraction. It was so strong that I got up on my hands and knees (I had been lying on the bed) and swearing, my waters exploded from one end of the bed to the other! They soaked everything within two or three feet.
Multiplayer
Lately, even though the ground is still frozen and our driveway is a solid sheet of ice and it occasionally still snows, I have been taking the kids on daily outings. I just can't stand being cooped up any more. I mean, it can be cozy, but enough is enough, especially when you've got two babies who have cabin fever! Right? I mean are you with me ladies?
Yet there are some Desparados
It certainly appeared to me than many of these kids were just trapped in situations where they were being forced to learn something at a specific time set by others with no regard to their individual interests, needs and desires. And I was more grateful than ever that I decided to take my kids out of school and give them the freedom to learn in their own way, on their own time.
Another great album. Trust me, you need this album in your collection - hit that download link NOW!
Hope I’ll be rocking in my chair
It is clear that there has been a large scale systematic project of political policing, given priority over any considerations for its legality, its cost or, most importantly, the impact on the citizens it deceives and abuses.
Set the map ID and X/Y coordinates of for the map that will serve as the
Now, of course, the country has shaken off Prohibition (as a constitutional amendment, although not entirely as a mindset) and a certain renaissance of craft brewing, starting in the 1970s, has led to the establishment of a number of very fine new breweries in the state. In a series of upcoming posts I'd like to give my views and reviews of the many fine and certain not-so-fine brews that gush forth from the breweries of Wisconsin.
Oh, but that's okay. I can give THE BEST YEARS OF MY LIFE to my children, and when they're old enough for me to not have to worry about their every move, that'll be great. EXCEPT I'LL BE 70. Yeah, I'll be touring the world at 70, and that will kind of suck, because my back will be shot, and I'll look weird because I've had that botched second face lift. Oh, and people might wrinkle their noses at me, because my bladder will have completely let go of the toe hold it still had on my body, and I'll have to wear a great big incontinence diaper.
The 8 o'clock of the wee morning hours should only be reserved for those who are willing to ingest large amounts of coffee. And even then, they still have to figure out a way to function. Just because you are awake doesn't mean you can or want to process information.
It feels so good to be writing and working on this stuff again. I’m so burnt out on school work!
Mr. Dahl: "I can eat them raw, but you can't. I think we should go to that Jewish deli-
But you do wonder who decided 1977 was exactly the right time to try sounding like the Bay City Rollers.
Violet pulled a staser pistol from her belt and pulled the trigger. A blast of light struck the Watcher, killing him instantly. Violet had a great fondness for stasers. Such a slim, elegant little weapon. Its slender barrel betrayed the massive energy discharge it fired. One blast from a staser would cause immense destruction to even a Time Lord's body. There was no prospect of regeneration after being hit by a staser blast.
Love you today even more than yesterday!!
…frustration
I'm a fan of just about anything Jane Green writes so I was waiting for this one to come out and devour it. I think I read this one in the span of two days (which is impressive for me considering how busy I have been!). I loved it!
There he had a vision. He saw a man in white with a blue and red cross on his chest. The man had placed his hands on two prisoners: one of whom was white, the other a Moor
I wasn't in the room for the actual birth but I was at the hospital with her and her husband for most of Sunday and Monday. And my friend, who once thought running 10 miles was beyond her capabilities, gave birth to an adorable baby girl who has the softest skin ever.
- Wild Boar Kabob w/ Habanero BBQ Sauce, Filet, Dr. Joel’s Green Habanero & Soy
“Jae, what should I do? I don’t know what to do…” He tell his problem to his best friend.
The answer is no, the “Transitional” state of Socialism is given the task to “Transform” the citizenry for the future super-state. So how does this Socialist apparatus deal with those who don’t want to be transformed?
Please go to: http://www.wyomingextension.org/4hjudging to create your judges’ profile. After completing this training, a star will be added to your profile indicating you are a Certified Wyoming 4-H Judge. Learn more about the database at the certification training!
The Lord our God, He lights our path
Last night was one of those nights when stress and misery was rife, (I’m being a tad dramatic, I was just in a bad mood) and urgently needed something to take this misery out on. Step forward Nigellas’ How To Be A Domestic Goddess and the recipe Lahmacun. She describes it as being similar to a pizza but do not be fooled by such a description! Firstly, pizzas have cheese, non? A pizza without cheese is either an abomination or in fact not a pizza at all, and as this recipe is not an abomination then one must conclude that it is not a pizza. The Lawson informs me that Lahmacun, as well as being fun to say, is a Turkish flat bread covered in a spicy lamb topping and the first thing she always orders when in any Turkish restaurant. I can tell you that while the Lahmucan itself was very nice with lots of flavour and crisp bread, the making of it was a complete disaster that nearly had me giving up on it. I’ve made various types of bread before and any that weren’t from a Nigella recipe have been a dream to work with, but as soon as I make bread from a Nigella book the dough ends up being so sticky it is almost un-kneadable. I don’t know why this is, although have my suspicions that as Nigella is an avid fan of electric gadgets in the kitchen she isn’t bothered about how sticky it is as the electric mixer does all the work for her. Not that this does the humble cook with no KitchenAid mixers any favours. In the end instead of kneading the normal way, I had to hold it in my hands and bang my hands together for what felt like an eternity until it reached desired consistency. Who needs the gym when you have unreliable bread recipes? And then there was a huge amount of dough literally stuck to the work surface that took a lot of convincing to budge, as well as getting it in my hair and on my clothes. Still, while it may have been a disaster, all that alternative kneading meant the anger was kept at bay for a while. Once I’d kneaded and proved the bread, I had the impossible task of rolling the dough out. Impossible because no matter how much I rolled it out, it kept shrinking back to miniature size, meaning these would have to be mini Lahmacuns. It was all worth it in the end though because they were really tasty, but if I were to make these again I’d have to use a different flat bread recipe, or, heaven forbid, buy some pitta bread.
So my assembly pattern was as follows (top to bottom)
Cunning
So, I peed. And I looked at my phone. And it was 7:37 AM, January 14th. And the test said to wait 5 minutes before reading. So, I played scrambling with friends games until 7:42 AM on January 14th. Then, I said a quick little prayer telling God that no matter what that dang test said I still loved Him and I would accept with gladness whatever the result was. And after a quick little glance I pretty much lost it.
Feel free to use any of the blots that I have made. If you use one of the zillions of other blots out there, I will certainly show people, but I will not have it in the contest. See the Collection for most of my blots. Also, there will be more blots showing up throughout the month, if you are one of those slackers.
a gasp, Seshta leaped up and stumbled across the roof. She felt as if she were swimming through honey but finally she reached the edge of the roof and crouched to leap for the tree. She hesitated, wobbling on the edge, because the tree was more than an arm’s length out and if she leaped for it she would stab herself on the spikes. Worse, if she didn’t find holds at once, she would scrape against the rough bark as she tumbled to the ground. She glanced back at the stairwell and knew she didn’t have much time. Seshta turned and lowered herself over the edge of the roof until she hung from her elbows, her legs scraping against the wall. From the stairwell, a head rose into view as Seshta let go and fell.
Then, after the drapes were hung and new pillows (Ikat from Crate & Barrel) were added, I swapped the blue lamps for silver, but wasn't crazy about the shape and they were too lightweight and I was afraid James would knock them off the table.
The medical area waiting room is in the middle of about 8 doors which open and close in a flurry of doctors coming out, x rays being stacked, people shuffled in and out of one room after the other. In the next hour I would see five people in white labcoats. In one door, check eyes, passed to different labcoat guy, check weight and height. As he writes the numbers on my chart, I suddenly say in English loud and clear, "Wow, must be those delicious French donuts!" I realize my crisis of nerve is really kicking hard now. He doesn't even look at me as I internally chastise myself for making some sort of Turrets inspired wisecrack about French donuts. WTF IS A FRENCH DONUT?...YOU FOOL...YOU IDIOT..WHY WOULD YOU SAAAAY THAT? TO WHO? IT WASN'T EVEN FUNNY ANYWAY....WHY WOULD THAT BE FUNNY?
They are also eaten with jam spread on them, and topped with whipped cream, then rolled up. You can basically do with them as you please, but the main thing is to make them as unhealthy as possible, and enjoy every last bite.
Hofburg, Vienna, 9-10 July 2009:
I wish this page were my hand, instead of what my hand leaves behind. I wish it could reach out and run my fingers down your cheek. I may begin to forget many other things, but I can remember every childlike drawing you sketched on me with your artist’s hands with the barest pressure of your index finger. I cannot forget that you used your love for ink. It is the skin that remembers love and passes it down to the heart that cannot remember it, but aches to. Not words, or pictures. It is my skin that understood the truth of what we are. It remembers the tattooed ghosts of caresses, and this is enough.
A few weeks ago, I was lucky enough to have coffee with my lovely friend Hailey, who lives way too far away from me these days. Hailey and I met last summer when we were both Auschwitz Jewish Centre fellows. We bonded very quickly, for many reasons: Shabbat, Israel, fear of flying, obsession with the hunger games, and of course, our somewhat morbid fascination with all things Holocaust.
AND…thank also to Anne Hale, we have a fabulous badge for this year’s event. It’s on the sidebar and also below, so go ahead and post it somewhere proudly and link it back to this post.
The sad thing though, is seeing the comments that say,
In awe of God's blessing of you in my life,
Down into a dream I fall
The first is a Fish food holder.
The submission is dated 14 November 2011, and does not appear in the official list of submissions (as far as I can see, let me know if it is there) and deals precisely with the issue in question: namely, to what extent the Commonwealth has the power to regulate traditional and new media.
So she had to retire to her fainting couch to recover.
Du Berlais (Fell 19th)
OK…we were a little surprised. They also wanted us to make it happen in 3 weeks!
While I am still conflicted at times, I do realize that being home with them all the time gives me a really unique perspective. Raising little girls is difficult. I am first hand witness as they interact in different situations with a different types of people. I am trying to help navigate the world with them. They come in contact with a variety of messages throughout the day both from me and from their environment- media, peers, television. All these things play a part in molding their personalities.
Honduran polling company COIMER & OP found that 52 percent supported
Hope you like my Card
Day 25
The second instance happened when I was shopping for a gift for a friend just a few days ago. I went into a local establishment and happened to run into my husbands former (maybe current) employer. I wouldn’t say that he gave me the cold shoulder but it was cool enough that the owner of the business asked me if I knew him. I told her that my husband had worked for him – well my soon to be “former husband.” She then asked who that was, being a small community and a small retail building I fully expected her to know him. Unsolicited she went on to say that she thought he was an “ass” and “weird” and that he was “a very angry individual.” I responded that she was one of the first people who I had heard say this out loud… most people think he is “charming.” She then went on to describe his harassing and intimidating behaviors to people that he apparently did not like. Behaviors that she witnessed. Behaviors where he would “go after” people and “get in their face until they did what he wanted.” She also said that she did not trust him because he talked poorly about his employer – a person that she liked. I was surprised actually at what she shared – he really must have made an impression. Her last comment to me was “I have always wondered who would be married him” to which my response was “Me. Apparently I was naive and stupid.”
In my work as a psychotherapist I am privileged to witness the courage of many people, many of whom face disabling circumstances in their lives. Recently the stories I have been told have focused on loss and absence. Some stories have addressed the loss of career, either to a personal disability or the disability of a loved one. How often a newly developed disability dramatically effects the lives of the loved ones of the newly disabled person!
My second car was a suzuki esteem wagon, named Tabitha, lovingly called Tabby. I had Tabby in college and you could cram all your crap into her at the end of the school year and make the long trek home. You could cram her full of drunk college girls and make 2am taco runs. She braved snow storms and flying rocks aimed at her windshield. Tabby was a great car who will always be associated with great college memories.
The docile feeling we share when holding hands, while stroking through the park,
But even if, for the sake of argument, the reader grants Nietzsche’s narrative above as valid, there is still a simple discrepancy that stands out when looking at the philosopher’s views on the subject as a whole. If Nietzsche’s criticism against women lies in their vain control over men to further consolidate their fertile power as the “higher” being (the creators of life, “the eternally feminine”), why is he so staunchly dismissive of the women (the “infertile” breed) who, in his view, are working to overturn this sentiment? I suppose the answer lies in Nietzsche’s conviction that a woman’s mindset is unfailingly tuned to propagating deception about her feminine nature, thus no matter which side she happens to fall in the gender equity debate, her motive is to be viewed with suspicion:
Well, that's all for today. I need to get stuff ready to take with me for tomorrow mornings craft club, I haven't been there since we started the kitchen and I'm really looking forward to it.
Oh God are you listening?
But then I thought to myself...self...there was another time recently that it wasn't so bad...upon the return from your recent visit to see Eldest. I had put that to a new mattress and starting yoga however, and also starting up the biking again, and really altogether too many variables to zero in on a cause, and who cared because it didn't last.
There is a happy ending to our story. What Daphanie didn't know was that the boy at the end of the third row was also a sufferer of GumB. Minutes before their demonstration, they both gelled up with the toothpaste of their choice. At twelve past two in the afternoon they were called to the front of the class. One stood on Sister Mary Elizabeth's right and the other on her left. On Sister Mary's signal their hands found each other.
But, then there were papers to organize, an apartment to clean, and laundry to do. . . so back to reality. Oh, and the gentleman and I are working on an exciting project I hope to show you soon.
wrote recently called "Love Somebody" that is specifically about
I forget Ubes doesn't know what a 38 is. But seriously, just because a woman is not a 34B or a 36C, it doesn't mean she doesn't want or deserve to feel pretty. Right? And I think it's funny that I have such a hard time finding my size, which I am not embarrassed to tell you is a 38C (I've been measured, dude, I know it's accurate), because obviously a whole lot of 38C's are beating me to the drawers and buying up all the "Big Girl" bras.
Cheryl is new to the world of paper crafting, and you wouldn't be able to tell it from her finished products.
I’m still looking for a free one from Apple but so far no luck. Do you know of one? Share it with me.
Please leave a comment on this post stating who your valentine will be this year, or whom you'd like your dream valentine to be! Mine will be my sweetie, Dave (although, my new puppy, Edward, may replace him this year, lol!). :) Also, if you do any or all of the things listed below, you'll gain additional entries (Those that already follow the sites below will be entered for each, but please still comment on this post that you do):
If you came from the kitchen I would kiss the cook but you’re sent from Heaven so I’ll kiss the Maker.
Vader: Confound it! That old bastard was right. This is impractical! Luke, help me get this helmet off.
“Blessed are they who hear God’s word and keep it,” (Luke 11:28;)
Not every spanking is like that one of Erica's a few years ago, and not every spanking elicits an erotic response from "the other hand" but for those that do... there's surprisingly little guidance on what to do with the other hand, and would love to hear from some ladies about what they prefer!
For a moment, didn’t we both believe the fantasy?
The definition of captivated is : To attract and hold by charm, beauty, or excellence. The archaic meaning is captured. I don't just want to be attracted and held by God. I want to be captured by Him. I want to be His captive. I want Him in control. I struggle and fight Him. I throw temper tantrums when I don't get my own way. But I always come back. The lyrics "try as I may, I cannot look away" speak of my relationship with God. I am like Sam. Sam runs from me. He is quick and tries to get as far as he can. But then as I am just about to start running after him, he looks back for me. Making sure I am still there watching out for him. Knowing that just by seeing me there he is safe.
mix in cooked filling
I’m back on the monthly challenges wagon so I’m back to at least 30 minutes of cardio a day in addition to whatever else (so if I train in the morning, I still need to do 30+ min of cardio). So, I did C25K tonight. TWO workouts today. Bam.
The nurse was nice enough, that is until she gave me a strep throat test. Have you ever had a strep throat test before? If not, I'll give you a quick little run down... first they take the tongue supressor (aka a giant popsicle stick) and force your tongue down as they tell you to say "Ahhhhhhhh." Then, while you're distracted, they sneakily take out a giant stick with a Q-tip at the end and jab it at the back of your throat. repeatedly. for fun.
All of my hydrangeas started turning green a couple of weeks ago, as they always
Supporting casts: Eugene Domingo, Ian de Leon, Rosanna Roces, Edgar Allan Guzman, Nadine Samonte, Bembol Rocco, Alwyn Uytingco, Karel Marquez, Raquel Villavicencio, Eula Caballero,
Dizzy Dancers Assortment: Recommended for ages 4 and up, Dizzy Dancers in this assortment retail for approximately $8.99. This is a playful assortment (more than 50 in the collection) of twirling, spinning animals. Each pet comes with a spinning base, dizzy cord and twistin’ tricks cards that challenges girls to complete cool tricks with their pets.
Saturday was my first chance, and I went out and ran 9 miles just to see if I could do it.
They went their separate ways. Arthur soon living on the streets and Percy trying, but failing, to make it as a civilian. Some men were just born for war, it seemed.
And I just don't know how to deal with it all.
There are many ways to use umbrellas for singing time!!! Here are a few ways that we've thought of!
So, as John becomes part of our life as we walk in this world, we try to merge these worlds—this world of mystery, this world of unexpected, this world beyond us—and bring a bridge into the world in which we live that will affect us and those whom we influence from generation to generation. So hold this in your heart.
We're off to visit Adam's parents this weekend and we're going to pick up a bookshelf from my mom's house, so I may have some more basement progress to share too. What are you up to this weekend? Have a great one!
Decorchick!
Dear Mr. President
I haven’t used it long enough to observe any long term effects, but so far I’m quite impressed. I’m definitely looking forward to stocking up on this when I’m in Korea again, and this time I’m not passing it on!
- The Sun Defines the Climate: As recounted by IUSB Vision, “the bulk of global warming and cooling cycles is the result of solar activity. CO2 is a minor greenhouse gas and man’s contribution to that is minor. Water vapor is the chief greenhouse gas.”
• Children learn the value of teamwork when they play organized sports. They learn how to work together to achieve a goal. WHO, (World Health Organization) argues that if children are pushed too hard, instead of learning team spirit, they will come away with feelings of failure and frustration. Parents say that learning teamwork during sports teaches them good sportsmanship. It is learning not to be a sore loser as well as learning how to be a gracious winner.
Satan’s attempt at this activity is to take the worship away from the Lord Jesus Christ and bestow it upon another. So, we read Colossians 2:18.
37. I create and contribute!
Songs of Lewis and Clark, a CD - $18
Tomorrow is the last day and we start with the final exam.
Leftside ft Syon - Nuh Other Girl
In other words, the day before the world changed forever I did not think or care very much of anyone beyond myself. The struggle for survival after first contact radically changed my perceptions, as did it for the human race in general with genocide and extinction staring them in the face.
No one in Britain expects tomorrow to be very different from today. No one really expects things to be particularly different this time next year, or the year after that. People find it inconceivable that the future could possibly be radically different to the recent past, but certain things have happened in Britain over the last 50 years that will make the next 50 years a period of total and utter transformation.
1/2 cup reduced-fat sour cream
I used the Gypsy with the Cricut cartridge Create A Critter with the one of the newest collection release from Robyn aka MY PINK STAMPER Handle with care. I love this set and all the fabulous wonderful creations that we can make using it. I hope that you all are inspired today to create something for yourself and for others in your life YOU ALL ARE AWESOME !!!!!!!
There was tuna sashimi the size of a stamp. And three kinds of sushi. There was no salmon, none when we arrived, and none when we left. Soup was a clear broth.
- As lonesome as a gull on a rock
They started heading west toward Seventh Avenue-a strange unspoken mutual decision. They were moving away from David’s apartment, rather than toward it.
Typically, I enjoy getting mail. I even welcome the familiar stack of "pre-approved" credit card applications that make the bi-weekly journey from my doorstep directly to my trash can. But some days, the awaiting delivery turns out to be my complete undoing, almost as if the mailbox had transformed into Pandora's Box while I was slaving away at a hospital night shift.
Days I exercised: 1 ish
It's been a really long week for me! I think my posting might show that...I figured I might just do a little rambling for you guys, and photo-dump a bunch of iPhone pics onto the ol' blog. I feel like I have about 100 different projects pulling me in 100 different directions, and life has just been crazy! But, I enjoy being really busy, and I like crazy. :) I'll be working again this weekend, but at least we have 80 degree temps here in Atlanta, to keep me motivated.
"There is some gray area," Lemley said, "What do you do about an IP-holding subsidiary of a company?"
3)if a Muslim man is confident that he is able to treat the women fairly and selflessly, and is not fearful of the retribution in the court of Allah should he failed to do so, then — and only then — is he allowed to marry more than one woman, and up to four.Hence doing justice to orphans as well as to all the women whom a Muslim man marries is mandatory.If he cannot do justice to all his wives, he must have only one.
I am a young mother, in my mid to late twenties, with shoulder length maybe longer, wavy/curly black hair. I’ve been married to one man for about three years or so,
Will be our sweet portion there.
This is one of those comedy bits in which a bunch of crazy ideas are thrown out in rapid succession, and the hope is that at least half of them will stick. In this case, the ratio of success to failure was about 80/20. And that is a damn good ratio. My favorite was Lt. Armisen’s request that a letter be sent to his congressman regarding a pothole. B+
Have you ever been in a situation that seemed bad, but ended up being the best?
My hubby brought some children's books he had collected over the years up from storage. And put them on the.kitchen.counter.
One downside to growing your own is the uncertainty over the acid content. The alpha acid is the source of hop bitterness, which is obvioulsy an important factor in getting a nicely balanced beer.
Kroneman M, Paget WJ, Van Essen G. Influenza vaccination in Europe: an inventory of strategies to reach target populations and optimize vaccination uptake. Eurosurveillance 2003; 8: 130-138.
Yes, I LOVE this race
Whoa! Look at that fabric. Kind of funky cool right? These are Burda Plus 11-2011 136B. Now to tell you how much I was paying attention to the little pattern sketch I didn’t even register these were pleated front pants until I went to sew in the waistband! And I had even marked the pleats when I cut them out! I was too busy thinking “I need a pants pattern that works, oh here’s one in my size. Cut! Cut! Cut!” Honestly, not a fan of pleats, but here its not really detracting. Agree?
You have a warm demeanor, and many people find you to be inviting.
This publication will feature full color illustrations, poems, and the work of artists colliding throughout the states.
In a medium-sized pan, heat the oil on a medium heat setting on your stove, and once hot, add the turkey mixture. Press down on the mixture with a spatula, so that it would turn into a cake-like patty.
Since I didn't get the gadget arms or become a super hero, I hefted myself up on the rail of my SUV and reached up. Rain pelted me from the side and laughter echoed from the car behind me, I looked over and a car of girls were yelling "What are you doing?"
The world needs our stories. So be brave, get them down, and send them out!
Smart Solution Number Three: You have to marry a good attitude with your skills to get ahead this world. You can have the best answer in the world. But, if you don’t marry your knowledge with your skill to communicate and build trust in the relationship, you are less likely to be heard and respected.
The North American Chippewa and Iroquois Indians use it as an eyewash, and as we already mentioned the little ladies and Indians of the West woods, ate their chickweed.
Ferment Details:
Strength – 5 % ABV
When you write things down, you can start thinking logically about things. You can start making plans, and you free up the space in your brain. Our brains can only focus on one thing at a time. We aren’t wired to multi-task.
I understand, God, that because of our disobedience and faithlessness we messed up this perfect world you gave us - we embraced imperfection. I confess, though, that I will never understand babies with terrible illness. I know you don't cause such situations - and I do NOT believe that moments like that are part of some grand design of yours. My understanding of your providence makes such a belief impossible.
As you have doubtlessly already read over at Clickthing (or is it clickthing?) and Conversations with My Id, Messrs. Clemens, Skrezyna and I have been engaging in acts of flagrant Twittery, with the added charges of Aggrivated Commiseration (after the fact) as well as Intent to Edit.
Acceptance: So, I guess it is true. You left me. I suppose I can understand why. I mean, why would you want to be in an electronic relationship with someone who paid you no attention. Who ignored every comment that you made. I don’t blame you for leaving, I really don’t. I won’t deny it hurts, but no more than I have probably hurt you.
Not to mention, a big part of the reason I do all this craziness is because I know that exercise is GOOD for my mental health. I'm going to keep it in the place in my life where it stays that way.
More pondering on the dating conundrum and my friends still keep insisting that I hook up.
A flash of light - ordinary, honest-to-goodness, real light - brought Rel's mind back to the present. Just for the moment's relief, and to check he hadn't imagined it, he blinked away Clearsight. Darkness was like a warm towel about his face and shoulders, infinitely comforting. Even the strain as his eyes adjusted to pick out the faint glow of a distant, approaching torch was welcome. And torch it was, from the flickering. Where the cave turned the corner ahead, an orange glow began to rise, flecked with glimmers of white-gold where the walls were wet.
When they were visiting last weekend, I decided to try an experiment. They love to hear stories about what their Mommy and uncles did when they were little. So I offered to read them Busy Day Busy People. What would they think about this story?
This time of year, it can be a challenge for many in Michigan to be able to make a local salad. I'm blessed to live in Ann Arbor, where we have one of the best farmer's markets around. It's a year round market and it's a producers-only market, which means that all of our wonderful items are grown, baked or crafted by the vendors who sell them. It used to be only a few of the farmers had hoop houses to be able to grow produce in the winter time...I can remember having to be at the market no later than 7 am just to be able to get a bag of Shannon Brines greens to make a local salad in the depths of winter. But now, thanks largely to a great group of people involved Four Season Farm Development Program, we have a lot more vendors that can provide salad fixings at the market, which is great!
The answer is a resounding NO. There is always a choice.
I'm sure that you'd like me to say that it starts here with just some toast and a slather of chocolate, but it doesn't - it starts with something much more simple that we normal folks can't make. But what we normal folks can make is some toast...it doesn't seem special until you realize that each one is unique. This is for the people that like to just have one little slice of bread in a while or have a serious love for the ends of the bread in the bag. This is fresher, quicker and cheaper than the others.
Captured by Neil Cross, creator of BBC's Luther. A man with only weeks to live determines to solve the mystery of an ex-girlfriends disappearance - using whatever means and methods he feels are needed. A shortish book, driven forward by dialogue, full of desperation. It was a totally gripping read - even when you wish you could turn away and not look.
Charles Wang from the company Lumoback had a sensor strapped to his lower back that monitors posture, and if Wang starts to slump in his office chair, a vibration instantly warns him to sit up straight.
Michael C. Jensen
Before there was True Blood on HBO, there were Charlaine Harris’ adroitly written Southern supernatural Sookie Stackhouse series. As much as I love True Blood, I gotta say, the books are far better. They may not have quite as much language and sex, but they have their share. More importantly, though, they have heart. Quite a bit of it, actually. And they’re funny in all the right places. I think Ms. Harris sets the gold standard for “rural” fantasy; I can’t really call it “urban” fantasy since most of the stories take place in sleepy little Bon Temps.
Age beyond age on British land,
And then a guy appeared, looking a bit shifty, and slowly there appeared another, and another. I felt that feeling I get when I know something isn’t right or when I hear a strange noise in the middle of the night which seems to be inside my home. They seemed about 20ish and looked to be the type one sees in the flats of Holyoke, from my personal experience, and one had a hoodie on which pretty much obliterated his face, which seemed odd for such an almost-hot day.
she avoids certain subjects
I feel that this is the point at which I should mention Author Nerves. There we are, writing away in our little garrets or (add ivory tower location of choice here). The email pings, and in comes a lovely invitation from a school or library or, in this case, festival. Warm feeling of being wanted ensues, and one agrees to do it in a burst of love for all humankind (it takes very little to make an author happy--chocolate is one of them, being treated as a real author is another). Then, just before the event, panic ensues. At least it does in my case. Will I forget what I'm saying and babble? Will the PowerPoint work (this is a new worry)? Will there be a classroom riot because the kids are bored/hate me/are demons in disguise? If you took my pulse before an event, I would probably be on the endangered health list. This time, not only did I have a really big (for me) audience of about 200 kids (yes, my event was SOLD OUT!), but I also had the Russian roulette scenario of whether my next word was even going to be comprehensible. Also, the clock was broken, so I had NO IDEA how long I had left.
‘And those who have recently from both left and right pointed out that welfarism is not good news for those who want a mutually responsible active, creative community have not been wrong.’
It’s hard to think of a worse law, and I was heartened to read on the Wall Street Journal’s Law Blog that prosecutors in Florida have grave doubts about the law and that they are poised to recommend changes in the law, even its repeal. The law is presently being invoked by many to justify shootings, even by gang members when killing members of rival gangs.
The IPKat was so happy when he received his lovely big (389 pages) INTA (International Trademark Association) Membership Directory 2005-2006 today. But his joy was diminished somewhat by the fact that, while full and associate members have all their contact details listed, and even INTA staff members have their telephone numbers and email addresses provided, Professor and Student members are just unceremoniously listed alphabetically by surname and again by institution, without listing any contact details.
To serve, ladle a little sauce on the plate and top with lasagna roll.
Ever since the 'incident' when Little P was a baby I now dread those automatic doors. She was screaming like a wild banshee and so with my trolley half full I whipped her outside and strapped on the Baby Bjorn hoping a bit of jigging would lull her to sleep. So loud were her screams that the manager offered to open 'the parents room' for me. My eyes lit up - I mean this is Waitrose. We found ourselves in the disabled loo, in tears, me stripping off my top whilst still wearing the Baby Bjorn so she could get to the boob.
in spandex plaid
Anywho, my Back to Eden garden is looking excellent. Hardly any weeds; except a couple of nuisances like dollar weed. I can't seem to get a handle on them. I think they'd grow on a rock if they didn't have any other choice. Any ideas?
Clothing Size: 12-18 months
One day at a time, praising Him for the good things He has done.
gray t-shirt & skinny jeans: Sears
Finally, we had Avery’s Mephistopheles paired with a raspberry beer-a-misu, which is about what you’d imagine. This is one beer I’d never tried, mostly because I was put off by the $10 per 12 oz. price tag (and that's in the liquor store). It was big, dark, delicious, and dangerous. Somewhere over 15% ABV.
This team may not have the star power of other powerhouse AAU teams, but they do have the skills to make them one of the best in the country, which is why Five Star Basketball has them listed as number two in the country in the 17U division. These guys will continue to make noise throughout the summer and the undeclared players will see offers and interest from schools start rolling in. Good luck to all of the players on the team the rest of the summer!
Today I would like to tell you a little something about who I am. I am an artist who has studied at art school, museum school, and college. I have been working for about 50 years. I have been represented by numerous galleries. My work has been awarded all over the country. I work regularly, everyday you will find me in the studio, working. I am a painter, and have tried every medium.
Last week we had a friend from Denmark visiting. Since he had never seen anything much of Scotland before outside Edinburgh, I grabbed the opportunity to show off a bit of the rest of it to him. We bundled the boys into the car and, within ten minutes of the front door, we were at the top of a farm track looking out across the highland part of the estate: forested glens, rough rocky pasture dotted with birch and rowan, rising to heather-covered tops where grouse lurk along with hares and herds of red deer.
-You get excited to go grocery shopping ALONE on Friday night
We had not sold our house before we moved, so we hired a leasing company to lease it to a family who was supposed to buy it, but didn’t, after two years. It took them four months to find a family to agree to a two-year lease, during which time we were responsible for the rent on an apartment and our old mortgage payments. It took us three years to sell our house in Nashville, a house we didn’t want to leave, and that’s longer than we lived in it. I could go on and on about the leasing company and the family in our home not paying the homeowner’s association dues until a lien was placed on our house, the times our payments from the leasing company were late, or when they stopped paying us altogether, even though the people they put there were still occupying the residence. But we got the house sold, and we were eventually able to purchase one which is approximately the same size. Our housing situation is OK, though our neighbors and our neighborhood are far less desirable.
What this info conveys is (whether you and I like it or not), there is no way anyone is ever going to prevent this war from taking place. We may perhaps be able to postpone it slightly, but this Great African War SHALL happen. Whether the blacks want to get rid of us or not, that is not the issue here. Their fight with us is another fight, something very different, but this is their own fight, not ours.
Produced by: Mass U, George Phang, Sly & Robbie
Check your history and then see what contemporary examples of Arabist racism can be found in Saudi Arabia and other Arabic states, as well as what has happened in the Sudan, etc.
2010.09.07 Iraq Mosul 1 0 A woman is shot to death by Muslim terrorists.
What I love the most about this movement is the joint effort of showing the world that, if you have a ratio for a recipe, you can use just about anything to make it. Whatever the types of flours, liquids, sweeteners, or binders you use, having a ratio makes it possible. Measuring ingredients by weight is fundamental for this process, even for those not living the gluten free lifestyle. Cake flour does not have the same properties as whole-wheat flour, so we should not assume garbanzo bean flour is the same as buckwheat flour. True, many flours can be and are interchangeable, but having a scale makes it significantly easier to experiment with different ingredients and flour combinations. What the GFRR has done is bring a lot of passionate people from all over cyber space, many with additional dietary restrictions to consider, and turn a ratio into a recipe that can be enjoyed by many who have to work around the same allergies, intolerances, and health issues. It is a movement to show how empowering it is to embrace your so-called dietary/health “restrictions”.
Hope you all have a very happy Thanksgiving! We're not having Thanksgiving until Saturday, so we'll be headed to the movie theater to see the Muppets!
I’ve come up with a simplified gardening plan for my ideal garden for this next month.
Common sense is where you find it, except in Ohio.
Paper: Crumb Cake, Whisper White, Marina Mist, Daffodil Delight, MME "Just Dreamy 2"
Woot woot! Go here to link up your MSS creations for a chance to win an awesome prize pack or a guest designer spot!
Then we get down to the slim pickings. There is only one living human raid boss, the Grand Widow, Faerlina. She apparently just loves spiders and death so much she voluntarily agreed to work with Kel’Thuzad.
For a while I thought love would bloom between Anthony and Edwina but Quinn never went there which was a good decision. Too many tangles if that happened.
And a final note to federal law enforcement officers and agents: More than any other single group, you should read Enemies Foreign And Domestic. On March 1, 2012, and for a few days after, it will be free to download from Amazon's Kindle Store to your PC or other machines and devices. (If you know a federal law enforcement agent, please forward him or her this link.)
Just now I am reading;
For this week’s discussion, comment on one (1) of the following questions:
I am definitely being bombarded with art, art, art right now...but it's been so good for me. It's been refreshing and rejuvenating...challenging and stretching...faith-building and growing. I've been reminded of things that I'd forgotten, urged to let go of things I'd been holding on to that I needed to let go of, and have had my eyes opened to new things altogether. (And I'm talking both literally and spiritually.) I needed this break right now, just me and God and some art. (If only I didn't have all these other responsibilities...right?)
8. strolled through Christiana (this is where you can buy pot and pot goodies. No, I didn’t buy anything. It was an interesting place and also very dirty)
The shit house strikes again!
Way more interesting to drink than just a latte.
ESPN adds a tripleheader Saturday, beginning at 5:30 p.m. with the Nuggets taking on the Suns. Dallas heads to Chicago at 8 p.m., followed by the Magic at Jazz.
When the brewery receives its rice, it has already been polished by 10%, and then SakeOne uses its own machine mill to polish the rice about another 32% more, with a target of 58%. This means that all of their sake qualifies as ginjo grade, which requires at least 40% of the rice to be polished away. Their milling machine runs often, and is capable of milling to almost any rate, though the greater the milling, the longer it takes. For example, milling from 60%-50% takes twice as long as it does to get down to 60%. Having their own milling machine enables them more quality control over the final product. They would like to eventually produce daiginjo, the highest quality grade, and have been doing some experimentation, but have not yet been satisfied with the results.
She knew in a second, as his warm eyes had beckoned,
I Caramba
The ‘W’ logo was shaped as if like a staircase in order to illustrate the idea of rising to be one of the best talent and management agency. Each division was colored in vibrant palette to create a friendly and modern vibe.
The pacing and fluidity have caused some reviewers to dislike Innocence, since some reviewers prefer more narrative in their movies (they would say that languid is, indeed, exactly what this movie is). Others, though, have been more sharply critical, mostly of the film's imagery and premise. For instance, Manohla Dargis:
By Anna Ekström
Ft. Huachuca – 20 miles from Mexican border, 30 miles from Nogales Rex ’84 facility.
We touch briefly upon the edge of the lake created by Brown and nearly filled in by Augusta Beaumont. Despite the weather today, it’s still too early in the year for the sailing club to be active, but numerous Canada geese and ducks are floating by on the glistening water. On the far side of the lake, a church spire rises above the trees: St Mary’s, where my parents married.
But I fail
The Russian analyst concluded saying, “We hope that he doesn’t fall quickly and disgracefully.”
She noticed my lack in response and had her nightgown put on. She shifted the chair, facing it towards me, before settling down. All the pleasures I felt were flushed away instantly. I didn’t know what to say. I didn’t want her to know I was still seeing him and more importantly to know about it. She held the whip in her hands again. She struck it on my back a second, a third, and a fourth time. The pain was excruciating. Tears streamed down my cheeks. A few minutes went by and she finally came to a stop.
untold numbers of “peepers” in the swampy woods
Oh, sure, there were always some big sluggers at first base -- Killebrew, McCovey, Boog Powell, Dick Allen. But there weren't many. Look at the first basemen from the World Series winners 20 years ago:
What choices can you make starting today to move from reactor to responder? Remember, you don’t have to be “perfectionally correct, just directionally correct.”`
Neville got his moment and then some… Ron and Hermione’s kiss was something I had been waiting for since the fist time I read the Yule Ball scene in book 4. I will admit to being a fangirl in that regard. I love me some WEASLEYS! I am also a bookwormish know-it-all so I have rooted for Hermione since no one liked her in book one, poor little Miss Smarty Pants :)
I’m beginning to learn that I write best (or get more done) when I’m able to write early in the morning. There’s an hour to two hour period where Bagpiper has already left for work and Cupcake is still asleep that’s just perfect for writing. Unfortunately, I really hate waking up early, so I’m still trying to adjust to attempting to be up at 5am every day. Some days it works, others it doesn’t.
The beer pours a reddish brown with a firm tan head. The beer has a malty nose and the flavor has plenty of body, with hints of dark fruit, malt and solid vanilla notes. Not as heavy as some Belgian-style ales.
In a content management system, every change made to content automatically creates a new version of historical data. Versions record every change made to content and “whodunit,” and stamps it with a date and time. You can also create a version on demand and label it with a name that will enable you to quickly find that specific version in the future. With these versions, you can easily compare two versions to see the differences and trace the chain of editorial events.
So is this what travel literature right now is sorely missing: that we should be performing – and publishing – neuro-tourism?
Proof that the universe hates my guts:
Oh, so you’re just saying that God is language itself, right? God is just the one in heaven that is speaking the world out there into being, into form!
I'm still planning on going to Japan for 1 year, but it seems like I will be going in December, if I'll get the chance to stay in the bank for 4 months after my apprenticeship has ended. Would at least be a great possibility to safe up even more money!
happy father's day and sunday!
A long 4 months later Hans came to Australia, with Evelyne and her sister, and another friend. Not the cousin, obviously... We all did a road trip from Canberra to the Whitsundays. In my old, un-airconditioned Laser. In the week between Christmas and New Year. We were crazy. It tested us. But we got through it. We spent Hans' thirtieth birthday on a Island in the Whitsundays. It couldn't get any better than that.
When my friend was finished sharing, everyone in the room broke down in tears, praising God for His work in my life. I’d learned to listen and God had spoken. I’d obeyed, and He’d acted. When He acted, I was changed.
I thought it would be fun to create a belated birthday card, for one of those times when I was late in sending out my birthday wishes.
Please forgive me?
“It appears to be used as a way to magic numbers to help other countries meet (internationally agreed) the objective of 0.7% of GDP can be assigned as support,” the President and Liberal Democrat MP Malcolm Bruce said.
Sampara Amateur - Chargeless Amateur Download
Well, I checked yesterday and this thing was ranked number 59 in the whole freakin' world. It's a frightening thought.
See you, gotta go write a piece on why the shaker pint is not a sign of the End Times.
It is customary for the licensee to furnish a statement, certified by the licensee’s appropriate officer or an independent certified public accountant acceptable to both parties (preferred when the parties have not had previous experience with each other), showing royalty calculations in sufficient detail for the licensor to ascertain their correctness.
“Obviously we have prayer stuff…but it’s not like religion or anything, just stuff…”
Metalworking jobs include welders, boilermakers, ironworkers and blacksmiths, while electrical trades include cable installers, power line technicians, and construction/marine/plant electricians.
Don’t let this happen to you. Always take matters into your own hands. Wear a condom. Get a vasectomy. NEVER, EVER leave it up to chance. You never know when someone may be lying to you about birth control just to get pregnant. Always err on the side of caution and trust nobody. That’s the only way to prevent this from happening to you.
Here's a close-up of the closet (details below) :
This may seem obvious to most, but as a new writer exploring romantic fiction, it became glaringly apparent last week how important the subject of relationships is when coming up with convincing romantic characters. I mean, let’s face it. Romantic fiction is about the relationship, right? We love to see how the hero and heroine get together; fall in love, and make things work despite overwhelming difficulties and differences. It’s the development of their relationship that makes us want to read to the end of the story.
"Errrrr....O.....Kayyyyy.......Hmmmmmm, well, let's do the interview anyway and see how we both feel at the end. What is your understanding of 'diversity'?"
I am in heaven.
Throw my parents a huge party for their 50th anniversary
PROTEUS
Most people if asked which is the oldest town in England will respond "London"
Ah, life with three kids, 3 & under. Something's gotta give. Actually, make that most things. It's always time to feed someone, change a diaper, put someone to bed, clean up some form of accident or mess, put on some clothing article, or shuffle the bunch out the door to get somewhere. And so only the very essentials get done. Mind you that things like a tidy home does not qualify as one of the "essentials".
Sous Les Micocouliers is one of several very good restaurants in Eygalières and the surrounding area. So if you come the area to enjoy the beauty of the Alpilles mountains, try the olive or wine produced in the area, don't hesitate to try to Sous Les Micocouliers. I am very sure that reservations are a must during tourist season.
* You can use an egg white if you're not comfortable with the all purpose flour & corn flour mixture.
Revolutionary Mac & Cheese
As I made my way to a parking space, though, I got stuck on the ice. Instantly, I flashed back to that night in January 2011 when the ice on that Hiram, GA road made driving the 40 miles back to Riverdale virtually impossible. There I was on a dark rural road driving on ice for the first time in my life, cars ahead and behind and a ditch on my right. My nerves were shot by the time I made it to the first hotel only five miles away two hours later. I was safe from the ice but there wasn’t a drop of Gentleman Jack in sight, or anything else for that matter!
Last year there were 33, this year there were 45 if my count was correct. And thanks to the Iowa Brewer's Guild booth, many of the new additions were smaller micro and nano-breweries from various parts of Iowa. Visiting booths like these and getting to try beer that isn't distributed here (if they are distributed at all) is always the highlight of beer festivals for me. Hop Wrangler IPA from Peace Tree was one I especially enjoyed. I may have to take a trip to visit Knoxville, Iowa sometime, because after tasting that and previously trying their Hop Sutra, they seem to be doing some great things.
“Are you actually saying you don’t want to suck my cock because of some guy you met on the internet?” his voice rises.
Level 2: MP Cost: 33, 28% chance to cancel the enemy’s buffs, Time between skills: 8 seconds.
I felt all stream-liney and tech saavy.
And what’s really happening? Angel is learning “to deny her identity, slowly cosseting herself away from the truth. She was learning to triumph over reality, and the truth was beginning to leave her in peace.”
The rest of my classes flew by, and I was back in the room before too long. Andrew and I watched a couple of episodes of How I Met Your Mother before he had to go to work, at which point I pulled out my paperback copy of Mitch Albom’s Tuesdays with Morrie, the book that I’ve read at least once a year since I first read it for school in 8th grade. In case you don’t want to do the math, that means that this was at least my 7th time reading it, maybe even my 8th or 9th. In any case, Tuesdays with Morrie is the one book that I’ve read more than any other book I’ve ever read. I LOVE it. If you haven’t read it, you should. I’ve learned a lot from this book and from the lessons it teaches; it’s the only book that I’ve willingly highlighted material in. It can change your life if you let it! Anyway, I picked it up, started reading nonstop, and had it finished less than 3 hours later. So good!
Before I finish, I have to share a Proud Papa moment. I was sitting on the couch, watching TV with Chickerdoodles on my lap, and I did something kinda loud and rude, as men are wont to do in their homes. She said “Puba!” (Toddler-ese for ‘Kuma’). That’s right, she blamed the dog! It was one of those moments that I dreamed of when I first learned that I was going to be a dad. I spent the next day at work, telling everyone who would listen, and many who wouldn’t. Then, about a week later, she farted, then blamed the dog. It was just as funny the second time.
For previous Wreck This Journal posts please visit my tag cloud and sidebar. Stay inspired!
These images may be unromantic, but they are at the very least honest. They don't pretend to be anything other than what they appear to be. The backdrop is plain, the lighting is even, and the subjects are present. It might not be much, but that's what a good portrait is all about, plain and simple.
Should I be staying at home and working on all these things I’ve yet to finish, especially the new manuscript? Probably, but in my mind, creating memories with my family is important and my problem is I want to do it all…finish my projects, finish my book, and still find the time to have fun.
Sometimes vocals on tracks can sound awfull, Painfull and laboured.
City traffic staff was first asked to review Governor’s at Davidson for a possible roundabout in 2005 by then Dundas city councillor Art Samson and his community council.
Kill the Solar boss in an online game session.
Add Coffee to the Hot Water & leave to cool in a bowl
( makes 10 x 10 x 2 or 3 inch pan)
And very curious.
The familiar, dry voice sent a jolt of glee through Jillian's chest. Indigo sat beside her, casually licking a paw. Jillian seized the cat in a bear hug that Indigo put up with for five full seconds before wriggling free. She shook her ruffled fur, and snorted. "Take a look at what you accomplished, girl."
was furious. Like a—
There was a bright pink Packard parked in a yard on East North Street for about three weeks or so... I kept meaning to park and take a photograph of it, but the neighborhood gave me pause. Not for nothing do Catholics call the area around Bob Jones University "Ulster"--and I try to whiz through Ulster fast enough that nobody can take a shot at me. Even though I really wanted a photo of the pink Packard (something I'd never seen before), I knew the only places to park would be (eeep) church parking lots. And they'd likely ticket me for trespassing, if their security cameras got a good look at my dreaded lefty bumper stickers. Ulster plays for keeps!
The tour works like this: a guide in Colonial costume—in this past Saturday’s case a local guy who portrays Colonel Crawford, one of Portsmouth’s founding fathers—regales visitors with local history as he leads them around Old Town from church to church, where members—some also in period garb—share some of the history of each church.
be open
You know where to go for the best deals and where to go for the bet deals on the items that some people simply buy all at the same place for saving time and money. Are you that you can find great discount deals online that you can also find items and getting good products in good price is just another part of your daily deals.
And let it begin with me.
Here at work, we had to take an online ethics training course. It was fairly ridiculous, with lousy voiceover actors talking about how they might have a hot inside stock tip, or maybe a country club membership if the other lousy voiceover actor could just make sure that contract gets signed or that PO pushed back into last fiscal year.
I got a great start in the class, then took the blocks home and put them up on my design wall. Then other projects came along and the flowers got pushed over to the side of the design wall. For years. I finally realized that I needed to change my expectations and just make a smaller quilt. I love this one too, even though it's very small.
Ironically, just as in the book, I'm convinced that playing hard, at least the way we did, builds far more "character" than if we'd worked at KFC all summer.
Favorite arts/science/history activity: Visiting museums and art galleries.
1. The Floating Pillow Daydream
Instantly I felt a wave of emotions. Understanding that the dog was just a puppy, used to the company of 3 other dogs. It must be scary on your own. Shame that I'd growled at the poor thing in a desperate attempt to get some sleep. Awe... for this man I am now sharing my bed, my living space, my kids and my life with, that he would instinctively understand what the dog needed and selflessly go out in the freezing cold of midnight winter and sit with him until he felt better.
Thursday I went to pick the boys at school, and James was sitting on a bench away from the action. To be honest, my first thought was that he was in trouble. But no, he fell going down "the pole". He scraped up the back of his right arm pretty good, but seemed ok. He could move his arm, everything felt ok, but he just wouldn't calm down.
belly pats and rubs from family and friends
On the bright side it gave me some good laughs and a whole lot of cool actionscenes but those 20 million dollars should have given me a proper film not this garbage.
now unzip(Decompress) downloaded zipped files from within the application.
½ cup grated cheese
_____My short term memory says "no" but my short term memory says "yes."
It's not remotely cast in stone, and may in fact change many times during its lifetime.
On one side we have zombies: the dead brought back to life with a craving for human brains and flesh.
2002: 140 deaths
Asher took care of the audio section, by offering a single piece that runs parallel to the video and fits splendidly in the flowing images.
****3/4 – breathtaking stuff, especially near the end, from two of WWE’s top guys. Great story where Edge had a counter for everything Undertaker threw at him, until he left himself open for the Hell’s Gate. They would go on to have belters throughout the year.
Amy's Blog - Amy picked a winner and contacted them personally
Red Cross First Aid Babysitting Course Friday, May 4 at Summerside Superstore Community Room. Anyone interested can get more information in the office.
Rango
About two weeks ago, JetBlue Airways, a Queens-based airline company that has its main base at John F. Kennedy International Airport, opened its new headquarters in Long Island City. Its previous location had been at the Forest Hills Towers on Queens Boulevard in Forest Hills, near where Queens Borough Hall and Queens County Supreme Court are.
By Friday, the story may be very different. I read on the Febfast website that you can buy ‘leave passes’ for $25 – guilt-free tickets to enjoy ‘special occasions’. I wonder if there’s a limit on how many of those you can have… and whether Mummy Wine Time constitutes a special occasion.
The continual process of collecting and reproducing a community of admired figures has evolved into a personal catalogue chronicling the influences of the last several years of my life. The further I proceed with this project the more I stray from subjects of my own choosing in order to meet the demand of frequent requests. As a result I have been introduced to several inspiring personalities that I may not have been exposed to otherwise. The process of creating these portraits has allowed me to become involved with the life and accomplishments of these people.
I picked up a big sack of rocks, washed them, and painted the base colors. Then Isaac, Gracie, Lily, and I each claimed a color and decorated them with as many faces and expressions as we could think of. 48 rocks in all. A few close-ups:
It was about pleasing the crowd with a sly twist on theme. Or throwing in a tricky word. Or slipping in an allusion that tickled your brain until you had time to look it up and say: Oh, right! I should've gotten that!
But last week as I watched them lower her casket into the ground I think they lowered just a little piece of me with her.
Hello, I hope your Monday is off to a good start.
After staying some time in Antioch, Paul suggests a return to the churches established in Galatia (15:36). This tour of established churches is not unexpected since Paul has already made a return trip through Derbe, Lystra and Iconium for the purpose of continued development and encouragement of these churches.
At least Satan Claus is only an hour long. It could have been less. It's so dark, I think I might have spent ten minutes watching a blank television screen by accident.
Sesame crusted with apricot-ginger glaze (regularly $9.95)
I am mighty and strong
It’s not veiled in backrooms for folk to poke and pry at.
So if we are going to do this it has to be “realistic” (I know, as realistic as finding a billion pounds under your pillow) and by that I mean 99% of fans would say “firstly I’m going to sign Messi” but I’m sorry, Messi isn’t going to sign for Bury, Barnsley or Brechin.
Dear Asher,
“Throw me, I’ll be buggered,” Bill pushed his seat right back,
August 10, 2011 — The Florida Department of Children and Families releases report concluding that Casey Anthony failed to protect Caylee, and that Casey’s actions or lack of actions resulted in the death of the child. The finding has little legal relevance.
The technical name for it is a “Pooh Ball.” (And that is bad enough already).
07 July DELAMERE Delamere Forest
but nibble on
This week challenge at Anyone for Anya is a
Souvenir-Book appreciations are typically written by friends and long-time associates of a con’s Guests of Honor and usually focus on the GoH’s personal and professional biography. Since I have had the pleasure of meeting Carol Emswhiller personally only once, I will focus instead on my many years’ relationship with a single aspect of the person who is Carol Emshwiller, viz., that mysterious presence readers sense lurking within or perhaps behind the texts of her stories and novels, a presence generally known as the "author." This relationship between a single reader and the particular presence of an author, although seemingly abstract and impersonal, is in practice a deeply intimate one. It is also an extremely privileged relationship, since only a relatively few authors’ texts create a sense of that mysterious, very particular presence with which readers so delight in engaging. I recognized and engaged with that presence the first time I read a Carol Emswhiller story, a presence that so intrigued and teased and dialogued with me that the author went at once onto what I call my "magic" list of must-buy authors whose work I’m always on the lookout for.
He probably won’t beat Sir Alex at the mind-games, and he probably won’t beat United in the title race either, but it looks as if he is putting his heart and soul into pushing the race as far as he can. That being said, I admire Mancini for having a go. He seems like a really good bloke, it’s just a shame he’s not well liked by association as he is the City boss. If he does get moved on, I hope he gets a big job again fairly quickly.
How: Just contact me to schedule your session. Sessions can be held in my home, or I will come to you if you live within a 20 mile radius.
This does not mean I will delete this blog altogether; all of the old posts will remain on this site. Don't worry, you can still relive all of the fun moments from haircut to haircut, lipstick to lip gloss, and - in case you're wondering - how I got from crushing on Peter Sarsgaard to, well, professing my undying love for a certain two-time Academy Award nominee who bears a passing resemblance to Mr. Potato Head.
We met up for drinks and had a great time! He was adorable and pretty charming. We got along really well. He was eager to introduce me to his friends (not in that “you’re my girlfriend” kind of way, he just knew that I’d fit in with his crowd well). He said he had a going away party the next night for one of his friends and invited me out to it. I said I’d see if I could make it.
#21. stumping dear old dad with baseball trivia he DOESN'T know
Best Costume Design CRAZY FOR YOU Peter McKintosh – Regent’s Park Open Air
“Both of those, I don’t know what they were all about really,” she grins. “It was like I had just accidentally walked into the line of fire with, ‘HEY! YOU THERE!’” She pretends to walk, freezes, and fires that well-honed rabbit-in-headlights face. “It was all quite surreal. I still think Kylie’s people were trying to call Jamelia, and they just got the wrong number. It’d be much more funny if that is how it actually happened. Go with that one,” she laughs as she taps my notepad.
here's a quick list of whats coming up:
You aren't helping anyone by doing this.
Or if I’m going out on the town , the bigger the better.
The adventure ended in Key West, the place our parents first met in the mid 1970s. My mom was 25 and my dad was 27. At sunset he was dancing along the docks with an african drumming band and my mother was in the crowd of onlookers. She went up to him, a stranger and street performer, and danced with him.
At the same time new tools to edit 3D object designs are becoming available to non-professionals. The bare bones 3D modeler SketchUp, which Google acquired in 2006, has enabled a new generation of 3D designers to try their hand at an area of design that previously had too steep a learning curve, and required expensive software. The program’s user base doubled from one to two million between 2009 and 2011, and it has become a popular tool among homebrew 3D printing enthusiasts. Autodesk, the market leader in 3D design software, followed suit with a bare bones, free-to-use tool called 123D in August 2011. 123D, which works even on a humble iPad, marks Autodesk’s entry into the consumer space. Carl Bass, Autodesk’s CEO, told me that 3D printing and consumer participation is a major focus for the company. Another new product, TinkerCad, allows casual designers to work on 3D objects over the Web without installing any software at all – and can share their modifications with others. When TinkerCad launched its public beta in April 2011 over 1,000 people signed up in the first week.
Half + Half = Dead. In this case, Dead = being turned to some kind of goo...
For a moment, he froze in surprise. For beneath his fingertips, the pliant plastic gave and rose. As if the toy breathed. And there, as he grasped it now, he could feel – yes, it felt like – was it – a heartbeat? He brought the unformed tiger up, four legs, long tail, a blob of a head that turned… But it couldn’t turn, it couldn’t, and yet, there it was, rotating in his hand, eyes opening, peeling plastic back, mouth widening as it prepared to roar for the first time. A roar that never sounded, at least not to Charlie’s ears, for as he took the tiger out from the belly of the machine, the gears came to life, clanging and smashing, a divine roar that shook the factory. With a vast yawning breath, an iron arm edged in steel teeth came crashing down and slammed through blood and muscle and sinew and into bone and Charlie, Second Machine Attendant, became the sixth man to feed the tiger machine.
“It’s already became my business, Channie.” I looked at his face. He stares at the window with empty flat expression. It seems that his soul is going around. “Tell me what happened.”
This design is somewhat similar to Mercedes early 2010 F-duct rear wing, which was passive. The driver didn’t have a control duct, as with the McLaren system. Instead the ductwork would only blow with enough force to stall the rear wing at a certain airspeed. Tricky to design and tune, this system worked well for Mercedes last year. Its not improbably that just such a system could be made to work on the front wing.
“Ejustice.fr’s complaint seems to echo these concerns.”
Naturally, there was more to it than that – Britain and France both feared Russian expansionism, and if Britain had also her naval supremacy to worry about, then France’s Napoleon III had a personal insult to avenge. The Tsar of Russia had disdained the long-standing protocol that required monarchs to address each other as ‘Dear Brother’, and written to the post-revolutionary Emperor as ‘Dear Cousin’…!
Wow! You certainly rocked last weeks sing-a-long challenge and we are delighted to announce that the crafty girl joining us for the month of May is.....
I look forward to future Sonny Busco cases.
Tuesday, the 21st, was the 15th anniversary of my Dad's passing. And as always I think of him and say hi and tell him I love and miss him. He was a really good guy and I was Daddy's Girl. Despite the hardships he put me through, in what was the toughest, scariest time in my life, I forgave him and moved on. For those of you newer bloggers, you can read about that episode in my life here in this 3 part blog post. I promise you'll be moved to tears!
If I ever have a book make it big, I want Suzanne Collins’ publicist on my team.
Anyway, here's the list. These people have been officially deemed a motherfucker and may be addressed as such without fear of legal reprisal. Much.
When bands get bigger the fun often wears off because unwillingly they find themselves running a huge organisation. In the case of sigur rós the process seems almost reversed. Your music and performances have only become more colourful.
Anyway, once I’m in the house I like nothing more than a good old fashioned chinwag. You can see how our chat went on the video below.
The cat seems to be preparing for any eventuality—springing forward, leaping straight up, jumping backward or otherwise responding to what the perceived enemy does.
Here is Bishop McMahon's message in full which was read out by Monsignor Armitage:
So stay tunes for a racy week filled with things like these, fetishes, anime porn, and much much more.
While reading Scaredy Squirrel:
It was like a morality lesson for young women: rape was punishment for bad behavior, ‘only bad girls get raped’. If you got raped you must have been ‘bad’. It was the boogey man that ‘kept us in line’ and working real hard at appearing to be ’good girls’.
Serving:
Inks-Distress, Plaid, Flowers -forever in time
John Piper. God is the Gospel: Meditations on God’s Love as the Gift of Himself. Wheaton, IL: Crossway Books, 2005. ISBN: 1581347510.
Repeat in this manner with one additional dc being worked between clusters in each row until there are 22 dc between clusteres. Begin edging.
"I think it's time you got a job and started buying your own food."
Our 2012 rounds will have a somber tinge to them. Comic Carnival, the oldest chain in town, closed three of its four locations in 2011. One of them was my regular shop back in high school, but had the misfortune of watching the neighborhood around it turn ramshackle over time. One was next to a Wal*Mart and should’ve had plenty of nearby warm bodies to lure inside, if only they were willing to read, or at least buy their Pokemon cards there instead of from the big-box competition. One had just been recently relocated to new digs that I never even had the chance to visit. Given the state of the print market and the precedent set by Borders’ collapse, the closures stunned and unsurprised me at the same time, if that makes any sense. The last Comic Carnival is itself a transplant of their flagship Broad Ripple store, still flying their banner high in a part of town I rarely visit.
and yes, she was in Swansea.
Meals here are served omakase, with Hiro-san deciding what to prepare according to what is fresh that day. Any dietary requirements are of course catered for, but he reserves the right to veto certain requests – my own pleas for no wasabi were quickly dismissed with a disapproving glare and shake of his head. Urasawa is clearly serious when it come to food but he is not without humour; in fact he is quite the showman, wise-cracking (“$10 a photo!”) and name-dropping (“I know Angelina Jolie”) his way through the evening. Meanwhile the mild-mannered Ken-san works quietly and diligently beside him, brows furrowed in concentration. He may be the sous, but having tasted sushi crafted by both Hiro-san and him (who sweetly snuck me a few wasabi-free pieces), it wouldn’t be a stretch to say that his impeccable knife skills easily match that of his master’s.
Of the twenty kind souls who’ve confessed to being followers of Beer Rant, five don’t list a blog of their own on their Google profile, so to Matt and Scott, to J. Tingle and David Rife and also to Brewme_SLC, I can only send my thanks and appreciation.
So what is demonstrated by the above examples of cultural bias is the belief that consumption of alcohol is a sin that shames the person who partakes. There is plenty of evidence for this stance in the US, but support for this stance can be neither demonstrated using scripture, nor can it be demonstrated while evaluating Christian tradition. This is an aspect of America’s Christianity and we can see cultural reasons for this stance, but we must recognize that not everything in the American brand of Christianity is scriptural, and that a lot of it is cultural. This can be very detrimental to the Church when it leads to judgment, feelings of shame, feelings of superiority, or causes rifts within the body of Christ.
1. Habit, of course. I like that hard punch of acid in my mouth–bad for teeth but like the bubbles.
I was blown away by the bags that have already been linked to our first linky for Bags and Totes and have so enjoyed looking at the fabulous bags, tutorials and pattern reviews. Remember, this linky is ongoing, so you can continue to add bags throughout the year.
The allocation of sales and property taxes in Lee County has become an ugly point of divisiveness. This issue really needs to be a point of healthy debate. This argument shouldn’t be about those mean old conservative commissioners trying to ‘steal’ tax revenue from the City of Sanford or the Town of Broadway. Nor, is it a plan by them to impose a tax increase on the city and town. Rather, it is a discussion that should be near and dear to the likes of Commissioners Hayes, Oldham, and Reives, a discussion of that liberal mantra– FAIRNESS. After all, these four liberal commissioners preach about it all the time. This debate should not just be about the city and town having the funds to pay the bills their elected officials incur; no, it probably should also be about the fundamentally conservative question of who really pays the taxes which pay the bills, and who then benefits from the product of those bills in this country.
It’s all a matter of degrees though. If we step up a prank and someone winds up being beheaded then that wouldn’t be awfully funny. What if they broke a leg? Or sprained their thumb? When are you still allowed to laugh? In Living with the Truth and Stranger than Fiction we get to see a misogynistic misanthrope made a fool of by the personification of the truth. Of course there are reasons why Jonathan keeps his distance from humanity but that doesn’t change who he is. Truth is not being nasty when he tells Jonathan the truth about his life. He simply has no filter – he’s incapable of not telling the truth – and that’s one of the things we use in society all the time to shield ourselves: the lie. I don’t think most of us appreciate just how many lies we wrap ourselves in every day:
Stupidity is a state.
It was nice adding a little warm up with stretching in there. Stretching is my sore spot and I really need to do more of it.
Now for my other wheeled love, cars. Guess which cars are stupid expensive here and you should buy them in other states and sell them here? Subaru WRXs! Good grief! They're not made of gold people! Have not seen one on Craigslist for under $7900 and that includes the 2002 launch year models. Other Subarus are being given away.
when touch matters that much
Well, on to today's project which is a colorful card. I used the adorable Owl image and layered it on the Gecko Galz Tickets please collage sheet. I also stamped the branches from 100 Proof Press #6355 Tree Branch to give our birdies something to sit on. To make the owl image match the background, I used colored pencils, Stickles and confetti on their crowns.
I have sooo many things to do…emails to answer…blog hopping to do!
As well as finding the financing, technical expertise and management skills to develop the two airports, Bush said the deal would stimulate stronger ties between Canada and Cayman and allow government access to Canadian expertise and capabilities.
One might be forgiven for wondering whether the world really needed another work of historical fiction on the subject of Henry VIII and any of his wives. At a certain point, one has had enough of the Boleyn sisters. Mantel, however, approaches the subject from a less romantic, but more interesting, point of view, that of Thomas Cromwell, secretary to Cardinal Wolsey and advisor to the king. Wolf Hall, with the exception of a brief chapter relating to Cromwell's youth, covers the years of Henry's struggle to annul his marriage to Catherine of Aragon and most of his marriage to Anne Boleyn. It is quite a sympathetic portrait of a man who is oft-maligned, but whose administrative genius and reformist accomplishments cannot be doubted. Those whose knowledge of Cromwell and Thomas More is confined to A Man for All Seasons may be surprised to find quite a different view of the two here. This period of English history was one of great change. It was a period of reformation, both religious and political, and Cromwell was at the center of events. As he delicately weaves his way along the path to power, evading dangers at every turn, Mantel's Cromwell also reveals himself to be a generous man, a patron of the arts (particularly Hans Holbein), a financial whiz, a clever and detail-oriented politician, but one who always has his country's interests at heart, as well as his own. At bottom, he loves England and he serves his king.
to work more effectively and to enjoy you life.
Indeed, those principles - or the threats to them - lie at the center of the debate. Two years after their first free election in 1994, South Africa created a new constitution guaranteeing rights that much of Africa had shunned, ignored or undermined and seeming to lock the land onto the moral coordinates of its struggle for democracy.
I would call the film more of an action film than horror. Lee plays Duc de Richlieau, a man investigating the strange behavior of his friend’s son, Simon. He suspects Simon has fallen in with the Occult. He is correct. Simon is an acolyte of Satanist Mocata, played menacingly by the future Blofeld and Crminologist himself, Charles Gray. De Richlieau has to match wits with Mocata and his followers through, whom he has a hypnotic spell over a night of satanic rituals, a giant tarantula, and finally, the Devil himself on horseback, hence the title. Mocata winds up losing is soul in dealing with Old Scratch.
All winter I've been browing racks of thrift store clothes in hopes of finding the perfect slouchy, oversized sweater to wear over skinny jeans on the weekends. I finally found one and love that it will transition so well into spring because it's a spring color. Nothing more cozy and comfortable than a slouchy sweater. Perfect weekend garb.
When preparing to sell your home, make sure the landscaping is in good shape. A lawn that needs mowing and that is cluttered will deter some buyers.
20th February (Switzerland)
The Likud as a party is more powerful than ever.
ODIs- 317, Runs- 11372- Avg- 45.48, 100s- 17, High- 139
Dear Stranger,
14. The Lights - Trapped Like a Trap Inside a Trap
Reporter: How old is your daughter, Alex?
If you know our stall and all the knicky knacks and goodies we have displayed you may understand the
Planningtorock (UK)
Fun fact, this area has been used to film over 20 movies including the 10 Commandments (1923) and Pirates of the Caribbean (about a mile away at Pt Sal.) I hear you can still find bits of the Egyptian city from 10 commandments buried. Unfortunately, the area the city was built on is roped off most of the year because of the Snowy Plover, an endangered bird.
Don't bother with the torrent of writing about this or that interest rate and debt financing. The improvident south will never be able to pay their debts unless they can devalue, which will mean leaving the euro. They can do this after a slow grind into economic depression, or sooner if their electors turn on their politicians.
But again, if you ignore the FM problems and just use its built in speaker, this thing is pretty good.
Funny isn't it, how White Supremacy gets to decide when a thing is done, has passed it's time, is no longer needed or relevant. How it gets upset when lynching photos are preserved and slave and more often ex-slave, child of ex-slaves diaries and journals are preserved and when history is preserved.
Leave it alone
So there you have my TwoCents! Be sure to share your TwoCents, comments, and feedback below!
Someday I may actually get the size of my bladder medically investigated. I don’t really think there are any issues, but I’m a big fan of water. If water had a facebook page, I would officially “like” it. Who am I kidding? I bet water does have a fan page. Sponsored by Aquafina or some crap. Let’s take a look… nope- it has two. Sigh. Man, sometimes our digital world just seems so absurd to me. Anyway, off topic.
I could have gone for a quickie to take the edge off, but this was our wedding night, so up with the pants, kiss the bride, find the car keys and head off to get her food.
Okay, there’s an extra Sloughi up there, but — my goodness. I can’t even count them properly, let alone photograph them. I think anytime the number of dogs you’re trying to capture within a frame increases beyond three, the difficulty of getting a good shot increases exponentially. These guys in particular move with such delicacy and speed, they really expose me for the amateur dog photographer that I am.
She is too busy going to dinner parties, and Prince Charles too busy lecturing us all on the joys and benefits of Islam, to give a toss about British troops and stand up for them and their interests.
Vulnerability: Power, strength, and confidence are attributes that leaders are expected to project to voters. But vulnerability humanises leaders, creating a “pull” of people towards you. People who ask for help often find others rallying behind them, fueled by a feeling of being needed and collectively working towards success. Clegg doesn’t so much attract people to help him out as turn people away right now so perhaps a little vulnerability from him would help?
Be safe, have fun and miss me tons, I typed back. I wanted him to leave on a positive note.
Check them out!
till you are satisfied.
“Proper?” I said.
the need to respect the legal rights of copyright owners.
Passive aggressive behavior is made up of little things. Lots and lots and lots of little things. Little things that add up over time. Kinda like water torture. One drip at a time.
There are three with buds!
My run always begins at my grandma's house and continues across town
Yet, even after you are fully convinced, there happens an event that, does not really alter your conviction, but pauses your thoughts just a a bit. Here is one such incidence and of which was born this recipe.
He pulled up chunks and shifted slabs until he uncovered the first radiant beam. Once it was freed from imminent danger, the beam shifted and the test subject opened her eyes. “I just had the strangest dream,” she said, stretching and yawning. "My nose tickles.”
However, that moment in Sweet Tomatoes with its unscripted, exuberant, and slightly discomfiting quality will remain with me far longer. For a short while, the kids turned my world upside down. They took control while the adults stood by and watched. They brought some of our home’s idiosyncrasies into a public place. They basked in the attention that came their way. And, in the process, they conjured up one of those rare moments of pure freedom when the divisions of space, time, and social expectations vanish into thin air.
For me, many of the things I need to remember seem to pop into my head right after I get into my morning shower. In fact, it almost never fails. No sooner am I in, shower curtain closed, shampoo bottle in hand, when I’m back out again, running naked through the house (unless you can imagine Demi Moore’s body here, don’t go there…it’s not pretty and may cause nightmares and retinal burning…). Trails of water droplets and flat-as-a-duck footprints are left behind on the floor, leading from room to room, as I frantically search for something to make a quick note on it before I forget – which has happened, more than once (my memory isn’t quite what it used to be and wasn’t all that great to begin with…). And it’s a little more than embarrassing to finally realize, as I’m standing in front of the livingroom window, dripping on the rug, feeling an uncomfortable breeze where there shouldn’t be one, that I no longer have any idea what I was going to write down. Half the time, Fred’s still asleep when I race past the doorway. The other half he’s awake but pretends to be asleep. I think it’s a survival thing…
San Francisco, California
Inhaling Zingers doesn't really help with the whole dieting thing. I know that; don't get your panties all in a bunch! But remember, I did all that walking! And it's all about calories in, energy out according to my new passive/aggressive friend, My Fitness Pal. My brother and sister-in-law have been using myfitnesspal.com for months now, and have both lost a significant amount of weight. My Fitness Pal helps you keep track of the number of calories you've eaten. I lost weight before by counting calories, but this is a bit easier because the website does all of the adding for you. I like that. The website asks you a bunch of nosey questions like how old you are, if you're a boy or girl, how much you weigh, and how much you want to weigh. Then it tells you how many calories per day you should consume in order to reach your goal weight. Every time you exercise, you document that online too, and you are given more calories to eat for that day. See how manipulative My Fitness Pal can be, making you exercise in order to eat more? Rat Bastard. But it's highly effective, if you manage to adhere to the calorie restrictions. Only time will tell how long I'll stick with it though. If you see me looking all skinny this summer, you'll know I stuck with it . If you see me shuffling through the aisles of Target in super baggy sweats with a case of dip in my cart, you'll know I gave up (more likely scenario). If that happens and you see me walking by and the tears are in my eyes, look away, please look away. Don't look at me, I don't want you to see me that way.
How You Can Listen
As the auctions wrap up, here's a look at who's soaring and who's struggling in the new art market.
I know what you’re thinking. Is it for real? Well, put simply, no. Expect this division to be flipped by next month. It’s just one of those random hot streaks paired with some poor play by division favorites. Four of the five teams are within 1.5 games already, and the Red Sox being in dead last will change soon.
I highly recommend this book for toddlers and preschoolers. This would be an excellent book to read to a toddler class at church or preschool and even better for a mom to read to a child sitting in her lap.
Gosh Velvet Touch Eyeliner, Black Ink
That suggests that the Olympian Times, fully practicing objectivity, provides superior coverage. I've already commented on the issues of objectivity, neutrality, and integrity regarding AY.
My first Golden Pints awards. It seems a long way back to the start of the year so these awards may seem a little second-half centric.
All three major global surface temperature reconstructions show that Earth has warmed since 1880. 5 Most of this warming has occurred since the 1970s, with the 20 warmest years having occurred since 1981 and with all 10 of the warmest years occurring in the past 12 years. 6 Even though the 2000s witnessed a solar output decline resulting in an unusually deep solar minimum in 2007-2009, surface temperatures continue to increase. 7
“This is another one of the ways we are using our provincial powers to attack those who prey on others and to protect public safety,” Attorney General Andrew Swan said.
For some reason this afternoon I started thinking about the first names of the presidents of the United States.
It was all I could do to stay still and not show my relief. Tattletale had anticipated this much, had drilled Regent on it, but she had been wrong in the past.
10:30a Drawing Together by KENTLER INTERNATIONAL DRAWING SPACE
Paperback VDM Verlag Dr. Müller (April 1, 2011)
I am just back from a major shopping trip in Birmingham - mega card-making bargains filled my suitcase (just made it inside the luggage allowance - TG) and spent all day yesterday making cards like this one:
I really believe this is no accident.
San Antonio: -2.7%
So support Bodegas Paso Robles and the other members of TAPAS.
I need to remove
They drew pictures of the ocean, and pictures of Mama's with babies in their bellies.
"You're telling me that this is it,
At that moment, however, Mallory Holtman, the star player for the opposing team ran up to an umpire and asked, “Would it be okay if we carried her around and she touched each bag?” The ump shrugged and said there was no rule against it.
My brain is a little tired right now so I don’t know where I expected to end up with what I wrote above. Hopefully that won’t make it less valid.
Not surprisingly, the early weeks of this month were filled with conversations about 9/11/01. I read one survivor recap in which the writer, now is his 30s, said that he is certain that he survived the worst of day of his life.
She is also separated from her husband, so there’s a bit of dish.
1 quadruped
So raise your Margarita to those soldiers, civilians and peasants at the Battle of Puebla.
as a nation, for turning our hearts away from you.
There on their front lawn was a big red sleigh and nine reindeer. Now you do remember all the reindeer's names don't you? Dasher and Dancer, Prancer and Vixen, Comet and Cupid, Donner and Blitzen and of course Rudolph the red-nosed reindeer.
According to researchers at the University of California, San Francisco, sugar is so toxic to the body that it should be regulated by the government. It’s interesting to think of sugar as a toxin; generally I would consider artificial sweeteners, such as aspartame, which can produce negative health outcomes in individuals overtime, to be a toxin or evil. Perhaps other artificial sweeteners, such as Truvia, Splenda, Equal, etc, which my doctor suggested cutting out to reduce health problems.
All things in our lives are for our experience and work for our good*, if we give them the power to.
Me: I meant drive-it. Shut up.
I’m pretty sure I’ll still be late for lots of things – it seems to be in my nature – but I can’t help but feel like I’ve managed to finally step into some kind of “flow” as the gurus always say. I’m more than ready for it.
Look, I know we mothers had a pact, but I'm letting the cat out of the bag. Get ready, world - I'm about to unleash the biggest secret to hit the innerweb since we all discovered that Alicia Silverstone is so environmentally conscious that she doesn't even use electricity when blending her son's homemade baby food. Here it comes...
From. Another. Total. Stranger.
“Please, God. Please, please, please make it all better. I can’t do this!”
Where did you grow up and what bands or music influenced you the most?
JD: “After he broke into my apartment, he poisoned my water. When I was unconscious, he and his friends gang-raped me.”
Have a great weekend... Pattie
The question now is – will credit unions have the courage to take a slice of “humble pie” and then take the steps to make things better?
Beeman speculated that, while the left hemisphere handles denotation—it stores the literal meaning of words—the right hemisphere deals with connotation, or all the meanings that can't be looked up in the dictionary.
FILL cups 3/4 full with batter
Salami (I used about 4 ounces of a pre-sliced, but hard salami would be great too), chopped into small pieces
Why It Worked: Rocktoberfest is typically brewed as a malt-forward Vienna Lager, a style well known for its versatility with food. There is no beer style that can be paired with a more diverse selection of food than Vienna Lager. The sweet, caramel malts, the light hop presence and the smooth lager finish make the beer both neutral and complimentary. In this dish, the natural sweetness of the creamed corn sauce lent a familiarity to the sweet malt. While a good dose of salty mozzarella cheese attempted to steal the palate, the crisp body broke it up nicely.
preaches a message that contradicts Islamic teaching. It propagates the message that sex before marriage is the norm. Not just the norm, but healthy, in fact.
This was the only photo I took of the dessert bar! See the blur? This is real time action! As we set out the dessert bar, guests were coming up and starting to fill up their plates. I had no time to take photos so I am grateful to Jun's co-worker Linda for snapping photos! Alison and Helen are behind the bar getting ready to spend the next few hours refilling desserts. We refilled, refilled and refilled over 1000 items!
“THE PASSIVE AGGRESSIVE PROFILE
Dancing and movement are so SOOOO good for your baby! It helps their balance and coordination, helps them to FEEL the steady beat in music, and also helps their visual tracking. Dance with your baby at home. It brings so much joy to their day!
8:15 Go BACK down two flights of stairs to check the status of laundry while almost all chores at this point are done.
Gregory: would you like to be Vice President?
Of course, now that I'm firmly entrenched in my adult years, I am more likely to whip up a batch of cookies than go the jar-and-spoon route. That does not, in any way, rule out helping myself to a little spoonful during the baking process.
All you have to do to join in the fun is leave a comment on the DT's blogs and we will draw a winner on Friday 19th May and announce the winners on our blogs, so do check back then to see if you are a winner.
Despite this paradoxical treatment, there are many conservative Christians who will profess that politics and religion can be compartmentalized, apparently quite arbitrarily or when convenient, and will call this phenomenon separation of church and state. The concept that James Madison, among other founding fathers, fought so hard to include in our Bill of Rights is so different from today’s application of that phrase, that conservative Christians can glibly cry “separation of church and state” and fool most of the people most of the time.
To find out more about Kyle and the company he works for please visit:
Next time I will slightly increase the hop additions throughout the recipe.
Since PayPal is an important resource for all of us bloggers, I wanted to alert all of you to the scam that these devious thieves are employing.
So to encourage myself I decided to start looking through pics a year ago to see how Sadie's head was doing. Sorry that some of these are great pics of Sadie herself, but they show growth in length and thickening of her hair. Yahoo!
Mr Whirly
The Dynamite House -- which Grandpa repeatedly warned the children to never go near to -- was an amazing relic of an amazing debacle of engineering and fairly high finance. It stood, a little unpainted structure with door ajar, a few yards from the Tin Pot road a quarter mile or so
Voila!!
The Institute for Supply Management (ISM) said its index of national factory activity fell to 53.5 in May from 60.4 the month before. The reading missed economists’ expectations for 57.7.
Wrapping things up, the gore and eyebrow aspects of the film do come together in an extreme manner when the duck killer takes a razor blade and glides it across a woman's eyebrow before plunging it deep into her right eye. I have a feeling both camps will be upset by this scene: The eyebrow folks won't like it because it shows the killer ruining a perfectly good eyebrow (creating an unwanted Vanilla Ice effect in the process), while the gore cabal will cringe because everyone hates eye trauma; particularly people who have eyeballs that work and junk.
Let me stop to give much credit to Fred Armisen. Tonight, he had to play Obama with a Cosby voice. And I don’t know if he had a Cosby voice in his repertoire until tonight. It wasn’t perfect, but it was passable and funny. If you recorded the show, go to about 1:14 in when he’s making the hoagie. He has this look in his eyes, which he gets sometimes, that I can only describe as commitment to the character. Even when the bit isn’t funny, he still commits hard to it. And that’s a very laudable characteristic about him.
Experience/Evidence Score __
When we made it off the airplane, it was after midnight and it looked like the other passengers thought that I was going to hulk out at any moment. They kept their distance and kept looking at each other with SAVEME eyes when I walked past. When we picked up the luggage my mother-in-law let us borrow, it was broken because God obviously wanted me to throw myself off of a building at the end of my honeymoon.
Thus, at least I fulfilled my promise of baking a 'soft soft' cake for Ah Girl. She loves it and nothing makes me happier seeing her enjoying the cake.
My sister, Maddy, and I got together last week and decided to do some science experiments. Actually, it was just an excuse to visit. We spent five days goofing off. We made cold porcelain clay, but I don't know yet if I want to sculpt anything with it. Maybe small things, like toys for my Santas, or something like that. It goes by many names: Porcelaina Fria and Biscuit, to name two. If you are not familiar with it, it's the stuff that many artists use to make realistic, life-size and miniature flowers.
Thinking about the good things to come
I have attended both festivals as a member of the paying public and later covered them in my capacity as arts and entertainment reporter for ¡Exito! and Hoy; but now, after working from the inside, I have a deeper appreciation not only of the hard work that goes into producing both events but of their unique roles in the promotion of independent and foreign language, and most specifically Latin American, cinema in this country. Especially at a time when the number of movie theaters abandoning 35mm projection in favor of digital projection is on the rise and the number of theaters dedicated to this type of adventurous cinema continues its regrettable decline. I strongly believe that, when it comes to Iberoamerican cinema, both festivals complement each other.
And he (the Prophet pbuh) used to say to his companions when they intended invasion:
I got the recipe from my mother-in-law, who lives in the Buffalo area. I thought the name -- Open-Faced Chicago Sandwiches -- was funny, because I'm originally from the Chicago area and never had anything like them there. But since that's the way it came to me, I'll use it here.
Corruption is the abuse of entrusted power for private gain. It hurts everyone whose life, livelihood or happiness depends on the integrity of people in a position of authority.
When I visited the then-mayor of Bethlehem, Elias Freij, about 30 years ago, he happily boasted that about three quarters of the population of his town, the birthplace of Christianity, was Christian. Today, after a reign of terror which included land theft, intimidation and beatings by recently arrived Islamic extremists, the figure is estimated to be down to 10 per cent. The Christians of Bethlehem, under pressure from the new Muslim majority, are quietly finding new homes wherever émigrés are permitted safer havens.
(Every time I say or write that a little high-pitched voice in my head goes..."Nebraska?!?")
Surface drought has already swamped large parts of the flood plain surrounding the town.
6. It’s loving to tell others how to live. Then jumping all over them when they fail.
¾ cup 1-inch pieces peeled uncooked shrimp
Cnr of Noosa Eumundi Rd and Gateway Drv
Where this line between convenience and obsession with technology gets drawn is up to the future developers in these technological fields. There is certainly nothing wrong with desiring convenience in your technology, but is there no way to integrate convenience into a product without propelling us into a future of obese, lethargic, chair-ridden humans?
The moon on the breast of the new-fallen snow
Tucker: The Man and His Dream (Joe Jackson)
Assalamualaikum and hello. Of all the "kueh" that I have shared in Tea With Umi, this is my favourite. So, I am sharing this kueh again with you my readers in umidishes. This kueh is called Cucur Badak ( Sweet potato fritters with spicy coconut and shrimps fillings). This is also another winner for breaking fast.Some people prefer to place a shrimp onto the kueh. The sweet potato dough can be replaced with tapioca. My late mum preferred tapioca dough. The tapioca has to be grated and the liquid squeezed before it is turned into dough.
That, I believe, is a legitimate question. And here's another: How on earth could it not?
At every stage in this Labour government’s attempts to impose multiculturalism on Britain, the Conservative Party has connived and colluded with Labour. The Conservative Party has had endless opportunities to highlight the Neo-Marxist, politically-correct terror which has infected our society, yet it has done nothing. The odd Conservative MP might come out with the cliché - “this is political correctness gone mad” - just to give the impression to beleaguered constituents that he understands their concerns when some spiteful council decides to ban the flying of the England flag on 23rd April, but he does nothing. When teachers, university lecturers, police officers and nurses have been isolated and attacked often for completely harmless remarks, the Conservative Party remained silent. And let me remind Cameron of the way he treated Patrick Mercer, a former army officer, his erstwhile front bench spokesman on defence. When Mercer pointed out some of the facts of life in the British Army on race and race-related matters Cameron sacked him. Cameron does not deserve good people like Mercer. Sacking Mercer was all about playing to the gallery and demonstrating Cameron’s commitment to the poisonous cult of anti-racism: it was an act of cowardice. I can only hope that Mercer will refuse any post he might be offered in the future.
"Of what?"
These are the survivors -- of the storm and the marauding squirrel bandits -- and they are beginning to ripen. At first, it was slow... one a day for a week.. but now I get a handful a day. Some are red and others orange... but all are tasty and juicy and squirt yummy goodness all in your mouth. I get to eat these at least... Mom has become enamored with the cucumbers and we really need ten vines to keep up with her passion. So far, the birds have left them alone and the squirrels are not brave enough to come directly up to the boxes as they are so close to the door. Now we will simply have to see how long they will produce.
So, if someone were to suggest that the federally funded baby-sitting service for welfare mothers titled Head Start were unsuccessful, a money-pit, and a feel-good program with no results observable the response might be like this:
This week’s Words to Live By consists of two images, both inspired somewhat as a result of my catching up on Jillian Michaels’ podcasts since the beginning of this year.
Simón Bolívar was born in Caracas, in modern-day Venezuela, into an aristocratic family, and educated by different tutors following the death of his parents. Among his tutors was Simón Rodríguez, whose ideas and educational style heavily influenced the young Bolivar.
“Marston coupled his ideas with an unorthodox lifestyle: his wife, Elizabeth, was also a psychologist, and is credited with having suggested a superheroine character. Both were enthusiastic proponents of a progressive attitude toward sex and relationships. they shared a mutual lover, a student of Marston’s named Olive Byrne, said to be the physical model for the original Harry Peter drawings of Wonder Woman. Together, Marston and Peter (with indispensable input from Elizabeth and Olive) developed a fantasy world of staggering richness. For sheer invention, for relentless dedication to the core concept, the Wonder Woman strip far surpassed its competitors.”
Kinky Afro – The Happy Mondays – Pills, Thrills and Bellyaches (1990)
We looked sadly at each other for a moment, and then he started to back out of the driveway.
No newspaper has an opinion on which other newspaper is of a poor quality or which journalist is below standard. If a poor story is written by a journalist, even if the Press Ombudsman finds a story to be fundamentally flawed, you will not find the next day a nation-wide set of editorials speaking out against it.
HAAAAAAAAAAAAPPPPPPPPPPYYYY HHHHAAAALLLLOWWWWEEEEEENNNNNNN.
As you don’t want your horse wandering off in the night, be sure to employ a method of containment. This method should be one that your horse responds well to and is used to. Possible methods include portable corrals (if allowed in the area you are camping), hobbles, picketing, highlines, etc.
I submit to you there are at least two reasons. First, Paul comprehends that blessings don’t just come from Jesus, but are realized in Jesus. Grateful believers are those who recognize and draw upon this indwelling relationship.
I realize that is quite a list, but everyone is in the Thanksgiving mood! Thanks from dropping by. I appreciate all the lovely comments. If you are not a follower...hey come follow my blog, I want to get to know each and everyone of you! HUGS
strangers that say sincere nice things to you
Style: B (2.5 points)
#20... Dora
THE LOVE COMPETITION: In Stanford, a group of volunteers agree to undergo an fMRI while thinking about love and see who can make their MRI light up with the most love. It's an interesting way to examine the myriad of ways of thinking about love, and the participants all come out transformed (whether the MRI has anything to do about it or it's all from focusing on love is at this point a matter of opinion.) I'd feel much better about the results if I believed that fMRI was more than just a few steps above phrenology.
Although it seems most everyday hits come from blogs that link up to me, one way or another - so, thank you very much! I hope you're getting some hits from me, too, if I have you linked up. (And sorry if I don't -.I try to keep that space not too cluttered, so an ommission does not mean that I deem your blog unworthy; I just probably discovered it too late, or kinda forgot about it momentarily at the right time.)
I went back to Ottawa Wednesday evening to celebrate my mother's retirement. She has been working at the same institution for 38 years (woah - I know!). They threw her a shin dig on Thursday evening and it was great to see so many people come out and celebrate her career. She gave an excellent speech, citing some of the many changes that have come around in her career (for instance - computers. Yah...and email...not small changes here when it comes to how we work).
Price ISK 2,500.
All you have to do is leave me a comment on this post. Be sure to leave your email address so I can contact you if you win. One comment per person please. Two winners will be selected at random using Random.org later in the week.
I kept telling her, “Wait till spring!”
collect it
What did you find out? Hopefully nothing terrible . . .
It’s a given that, barring accidents, most of those who need ops or drugs are probably more likely to be among the legions of sick and disabled than among the well and it becoming increasingly clear, as I’ve said before, that these bastards want us dead.
All my love, baby girl!
“The pilgrims. They came over on boats and killed the Indians.” Roland’s back straightened and a truculent grin stretched across his chiseled jaw as he stared down upon his shorter friend. “Your people tricked them, like Sister Nancy said in history class,” he finished with condescending smite.
John:
A child is not a lab rat. She is not an experiment. You won't get another chance if your methods don't yield a desirable result. This is your only chance.
Lately I have had to defend the Democratic Party against brazen falsehood by some folks on the right. Ann Coulter, PaganTemple, and some guy at Human Events have decided to push a big lie in order to make the Republican Party seem enlightened and virtuous, and the Democratic Party "the Party of Slavery."
The rain, when it hit the hot spring water of the baths sent up plumes of steam.
Right after I lie down for a bit; my tummy hurts.
It was a grand teacher that showed us how to put aside our petty differences and act in unison for the greater benefit of all.
(some rooms have more than a few kinds on each WALL!!)
should come running by,
And don't forget, this is the last day to enter Cathryn's giveaway for a free copy of her debut novel, The Demise of the Soccer Moms, and a free Kindle! Visit her blog for details at Suburban Noir.
Saturday’s event uniquely featured two 30-minute races separated by just 10-minutes.
The costs of litigation, like profits lost to infringement, reduce the value of IP as an incentive to innovate. Bessen and Meurer calculate that lawsuits cost infringers, on average, US$500k in legal fees. However, the negative impact on stock market value means that these firms lose on average US$28.7M. With Ford, they argue that NPEs create billions of dollars of lost wealth which is not transferred to innovators. The success of NPE litigation increases incentives for broad, low-quality patents and therefore decreases the ability of patents to incentivise innovation.
maybe just like the autumn leaves,
We probably made it out around 1230. The first two miles is always a little painful. The Crescent trail is deceptive. Your mind keeps denying there is a grade because it is slight enough that you quickly become accustomed to it. You usually find yourself looking down at your bike or little-engine-that-could quads wondering whether something is too loose or too tight. Honestly it only just kinda sucks. If I was in a better state it wouldn’t have been a problem; I had done this route at least 20 times before. The only this on this miserable heavy chiaroscuro day that sustained us was our destination. A crappy McDonalds in the armpit of suburban Bethesda. I wasn’t hungry. I needed something though, and what better than biking through the great monument of the golden arches, a commemoration to power, success, and weighty American hegemony.
It is to be wondered – if we could live in peace and safety if we accept a Dark Pixie to rule us, does that suggest that we CANNOT expect peace and safety if we REFUSE such rule? A threat from the wylds?
Jessica Spiegel, Pro bono coordinator, BBA Volunteer Lawyers Project- Moderator
and spend it on poor people
You also get to plan events or upcoming meetings.
Then after an eternity (okay, probably 5 minutes) she threw herself backwards and I felt that she might have been done with it. Either way, I didn't have the courage to continue or allow it to worsen. It was our first time and it had gone well enough.
You can choose any jam you like – I just happened to have my mother-in-law’s incredible homemade black currant jam on hand. I found this particular flavour so complimentary to the cookies, because it’s just the slightest bit sour. I recommend you go for a jam that runs along the same, tart lines as it creates a more sophisticated flavour pairing with the cookies themselves. Think of the final product as a grown-up version of PB&J, even though kids of all ages will go crazy for it. The AB&J – the A is for Almond not Adult. That would be boring.
In 2001, Kellogg’s finally realised their combination of ignorance and arrogance had led to dismal failure in India. They realised that they were not going to change the Indian consumers’ age old eating habits, in one short decade, and that they needed to change their strategy to succeed in India.
I see you in bight light
…She silently cooked the dishes, did the laundry and fed the pigs. … My grandpa, who turned out to be a village teacher, treated her nicely, but it all didn’t matter. He died at the age of 39, leaving her a shattered family with two teenage boys to feed.
I remember being five. Six. Seven. And eight and nine and ten. And candy was such a treat to have. Usually it had to have chocolate because fruity candies and me? Yeah. It was not love at first sight.
But I do know what life is like when you are so down, you can’t smile and you aren’t sure you’ll ever smile again.
And yeah for a very brief, but welcome appearance from Bob! I miss Bob and Lee. That’s all I’ve got for this week. Leave me your two cents! Only four more episodes to go!
Please be seated at least 15 minutes before the start of the function.
We often let unnoticed the valuables we have and complain. When I was at home, I used to say “amma! Is this the only thing I have for the day? I am fed up of eating the same thing again and again.” She always tries to satisfy the needs of the family. I knew she prepares the best but I always tried to get new dishes every day. Ah, every kid tries the same, I know. ;)
They’ll also call each other “fruits” and “queers” and “queens.”
1 cup stock, yeah the stuff you have in your freezer, non?
Atterbury (3rd), Jurancon II (Fell 4th), Montreal (Fell 6th); 2005 It Takes Time (4th), Lord Atterbury (Fell 1st); 2006 Therealbandit (PU Bef
Poole council, well deserving Prats of The Week!
Well done, Tina!
Yet the BNP mockingly use such a phrase knowing full well its origins and little caring it seems, the mind boggles at their treachery and indeed reasoning, if those who so very insultingly use this phrase within this supposed nationalist party, had half the bravery of those men and women, then our country would have some chance, as it is I despair of nationalism in this country, racked as it is by dispute, small parties vying for supremacy over each other whilst the people go to hell. Moreover rather than lying to the electorate pertaining to personal bravery, would it not be better if the “three highest-profile elected politicians”, addressed the real issues instead of hiding behind anti-Islamic nonsense.
Awakened One of Tools, on the
Atlantic Yards as Tower in a Super-block of Landscaping
As a side note, since I probably won’t blog again about our labor & delivery, I wanted to let you know that we highly recommend The Pink Kit for labor & delivery preparation. Since we obviously weren’t able to take any traditional childbirth classes (they don’t offer them here), we had to find our own “class”. After going through The Pink Kit, we’d recommend it to anyone, even if you can take a traditional childbirth class. Check it out!
_______________
One may say that sunrise should be the most important approaches for the beginning of the day, and the beginning of work on the new achievement and new success, and this is true I think everyone would agree upon, the question is of the most beautiful beginning or end, here’s the difference?
Honestly, I think that varies from person to person. This is the path I feel right on. Loki came to me, ripped my world apart, put it back together again so it works better, and continues to do so. Working with Him is something I adore. People may choose their path, or find it chosen for them. But I think that, either way, it is a show of devotion and also a way that we allow them into our lives. A way of being close.
"RECENTLY, I’VE BEEN THINKING about something I wrote fourteen years ago, which has become one of my most quoted passages: “Every morning when I wake up I ask myself whether I should write, or blow up a dam.” Despite having faith in my work as a writer, I knew that it wasn’t a lack of words that was killing salmon in the Northwest. It was the presence of dams.
We here at The Ad Contrarian World Headquarters would like to welcome Pinterest to the official registry of Idiot's-Answers-To-Everything. It joins the hallowed ranks of podcasts, widgets, Facebook, apps, Twitter, social media, and content.
Regretsy is like a playground for the vicious and irresponsible, rife with angry humor, snark, and the F-word, so it’s probably not to everyone’s tastes. But in small doses it makes me laugh and cringe and want to never admit that I shop at Hobby Lobby. And it’s not all bad–Regretsy has raised over $180,000 for charitable projects since 2009. Plus, many of the crafters whose work is “featured” end up selling the work and reaping lasting benefits from the hundreds of hits sent their way. Yet other crafters share their feelings by composing tender, rage-filled emails to Helen, which she then offers up for communal mockery.
I have others "safeties" too. Close friends and even friends I have recently met that I just feel safe with. You know, the kind you can easily share the details of how you tried to cure a yeast infection with a garlic clove. (it works by the way)
Had the place to ourselves, and you're probably wondering by now what any of this has to do with beer or whiskey or anything else you might be interested in -- to which I think I can properly reply that it's my blog, and I can write about whatever, no? -- but here's your payoff: Cathy and I ordered beers from their local-heavy selection. She got a Cape Anne IPA, which had a solid malt character I found appealing, and I got a Berkshire Steel Rail Extra Pale, a beer I've always enjoyed since my first tasting, years ago. And I was reading the label, curious if they had an ABV listed (5.3%, it turns out), when I came across the text shown in the picture: "In the words of renowned beer writer Lew Bryson, Steel Rail EPA is 'what the water in heaven oughta taste like.'"
Now last year BT decided the public phone, situated in the middle of the village was no longer viable so removed it. However they left the box, empty and uncared for. So the local book club came up with a wonderful idea. They have filled it with books looking for new homes. They have invited the entire village to take part and enjoy using the new local 'library.'
Language Log is always totally fascinating. Today, Victor Mair's admirably informative post about linguistic aspects of the politics of Hong Kong - a subject I would never otherwise have heard anything about - contains the following aside:
We finally arrived at the Blue Diamond Hotel so we paid the taxi driver, who tried to get more money from us, but we held firm on the meter price. We checked in, and they informed us that they were overbooked so we would be put in the VIP suite for the evening and then moved to our reserved room the next day. Wow! Now things were looking up. The room was on the top floor and very spacious. We quickly changed clothes and headed out to dinner as it was now 8:30 p.m., and we had not eaten any dinner. We walked around the block but saw nothing that caught our interest so we decided to return to the hotel and just order room service instead. We ordered sea bass and baby-back ribs and waited for about 30 minutes. Finally, our food arrived, and we sat down to eat it. Unfortunately, the food had cooled off, but the bass and the ribs were excellent. We relaxed for the rest of the evening in our luxurious surroundings.
Since I read The Opposite of Me so long ago and didn’t write a review then, I'm just going to give you the back-of-the-book blurb:
I'd been drawn here primarily because of the Burmese offerings, and we make no hesitation in ordering the tea leaf salad, a dish not commonly found outside of Burma. The salad is a complex mix of pickled tea leaves, tomatoes, coriander, garlic, cabbage and chilli, an intriguing combination of sweet, salty, spicy, sour and bitter. Its rarity outside the country is due to the difficulty in obtaining its primary ingredient, pickled tea leaves.
'I want to reassure our local community that the safety and well-being of our patients is our highest priority.'
To be honest we were into heavy shit! I just left a Hardcore Metal band and Dave just left a Death Metal band, so if you listen carefully you’ll always hear those two elements somewhere in the music, but I think on top of that we really loved bands like Deftones, Tool, Slipknot, Pantera…ya know bands that bring power, groove and a big sound!
And soon, defeated foe – my will,
In an internet forum a South African pilot operating in Libya also commented that VASTech was well known to the rebels.
Non-Linear Junction Detectors The Non-Linear Junction Detector (NLJD) is technically a microwave transmitter and receiver, designed to detect all transistors, diodes and other semiconductor devices which are found in transmitters, tape recorders, electret microphones and other eavesdropping devices. The NLJD is the only type of instrumentation that can successfully detect all radio transmitters, regardless of their transmission frequency, even if its battery is no longer active. Without the NLJD, the TSCM service would be unable to detect tape recorders, hidden electret microphones, remotely controlled transmitters, ultrasonic, infrared or microwave transmitters and other hidden devices which may be embedded in the walls or furniture and possibly beyond the detection capability of other test equipment.
I wasn't going to post this Cheesy Cauliflower and Bean Pasta. It was a quick weeknight dish that I made on a low energy night when I was very tempted to get takeaway. There was a large cauliflower that had been in the fridge for a week. I was starting to feel guilty every time I looked in the crisper. It was really intended for Mel's risotto but pasta seemed easier. It was surprisingly good. E loved it. And there were leftovers for Friday night. So it is recorded below. Quantities are approximate because I didn't use measurements.
State: Libba Bray’s crazy mind
I was going to call this Manchester IPA. Because the brewhouse name is IP. And it was brewed in Manchester. What makes a beer an IPA? Well, it depends very much on who you ask. I'm sure there are plenty who will give a very self-assured and clear definition. Me, I've looked at too many price lists and brewing logs to be able to clearly define anything. IPA has been different things and different times. And different things at the same time, depending on where you were. I've given up trying to separate Pale Ale and IPA. There's only one objective criterion: what the brewer called it.
for the record: I'm in complete, deep envy of the art class students. There are a few in some of my other classes, and when they work on their homework for art I want to steal it. Oh how I drool for artistic ability. Some people count photography as art but I don't think it is - God's already painted nature so it's like taking a photo of someone else's canvas.
Boulevard Brewing Co. 21st Anniversary Fresh Hop Pale Ale
"Of course the father and mother accompanied the young wife to her new domain, but they returned as is customary at the end of a few days. Bluebeard had but one occupation and but one passion: hunting, to which he devoted himself all day long.
As of this morning about 9 national advertisers have announced that they are backing away (for a while at least) from their financial support of Rush. It would be interesting to see if local advertisers are also backing off. Only time will tell if this has been Rush's Glen Beck moment (I would bet it will not be), but this dishonest apology should provide ample evidence that Rush is not sorry, will not change and is a vile today as he was last week.
"Two B's?" (no rebecca/ca/kah/ckah is spelt like that wtf.)
Yes we should rescue the children! Yes we should seek social justice for those who hurt, and wound and harm and do great violence. Yes we should protect those who are vulnerable and be the voice to those who have no voice. But we must not forget that those who do the harm and those who love great violence will not be curbed by social justice alone… we must remember to pray that they will meet Jesus and be changed from the heart of things as we were.
Breakups can be experienced in two different ways, the person who’s leaving versus the person who is being left. Before we move forward, we need to understand that sometimes people are forced into moving on because is the best choice for them. For example, you caught your boyfriend or girlfriend cheating or committing foul play, that’s a reason to put on your thinking cap on and move along. At this instance, the experience reverses, the person leaving, is forced into a choice they probably never really consider making. A really tough decision we can’t all make,that’s probably the reason why you see a lot of women put up with guys even after catching them in the act. You can see them trying to mend broken relationships, nevertheless, there’s certain things that can’t be taped back together.
On Thursday morning I got a call from the vet. Fonti had been okay over night but now he had taken a turn for the worse. He had spiked a fever and after a new ultrasound they had discovered a large amount of fluid in his abdominal cavity. Should they do a needle expiration to see what it was? Yes.
"The syrup colors the head as well as the beer, the woodruff making for a vivid lime-cordial hue and the raspberry looking more like peach. Everyone knows the flavor of raspberry, but what about the essence of woodruff? Sampled on its own, it is heavily fragrant, with notes of hay, lemon grass, and cough drops. The herb grows in the forests around Berlin, and is also used to make a soft drink and to flavor mineral water. When Berliner Weisse is served in this way, the idea is that the drinker first tastes the sweetness of the syrup, then sense the acidity of the beer.
So, as we journey along the way we felt it best to share of work on this case…
3. Submit your photographs and Illustrations by Flickr. An account has been set up where you can upload files. Please email AdamBook2@gmail.com for instructions.
Monday:
It was worth the drive, as it was full to the brim with things that could fill the book ‘Things Emily wants, but shouldn’t buy, as she won’t be able to afford food’.
Single Sided 7'' Flexi
Your “advisors” are playing campaign games with a radio host, who does not hold elected office, and you are doing so because he has the nerve to say something about your teleprompter, your cluelessness and your many gaffes. And the fact that he makes $50M/year and has a huge radio following – all of whom seem to have the audacity to distrust you and your $9.3 trillion dollar plans – really pisses you off, doesn’t it?
Back to the here and now... well, Saturday, anyway. Slipshod took Sweet Pea out "for an adventure," as we say, on Saturday. Their plan was to go to Costco and the hardware store. They made it to Costco and did a big shopping trip there, but Sweet Pea fell asleep on their way back toward home so Slipshod brought her home and then didn't have time to go to the hardware store by himself because he had to get ready for our visit to a co-worker and his wife at 4pm. Sweet Pea actually ended up sleeping for an hour or more on the couch after Slipshod brought her home, and I just let her sleep. It was kind of great - there was a period of time during which both girls were sleeping. Amazing.
Last night our team won at our local Annual Fish & Chips Quiz night. We've been going to this quiz for years and never come anywhere near winning. It must have been the extreme cold. It must have sharpened up our brains.
Your poor ugly fluffy hat.
She currently lives in San Diego, CA. She and her husband are the parents of a birth child, an adopted child. From March 2003 to August 2006, Dr. Morse and her husband were foster parents for San Diego County. During that time, they cared for a total of eight foster children.
The Steering Committee of BERSIH 2.0 comprises:
I hate to diverge from the retro oriented topics; however, I can't help but mention our experience on the utterly destroyed beaches on the Gulf. The Gilligan family is vacationing in my favorite part of the country, The French Quarter. We decided to stop by the beach en route and were highly disturbed by what we saw.
Promo Reel: These are cinematic trailers and US radio advertisement tracks. The trailers are from the US release, the Japanese release and the French release.
Trekking of any place offers you an opportunity to explore that place properly. With the help of trekking, you can also explore the culture and activities of the people living in the mountainous region. Trekking in India is a famous adventurous activity and people from different parts of the world visit India to enjoy trekking and gain some life time unforgettable experiences of different places. Though there are numbers of trekking destinations in India but trekking destinations in North India is said to be the paradise for the trekkers. Different trekking destinations of Himalayan belt are famous all over the world like Gasrhwal, Homachal, Ladakh and Sikkim. Even the foothills of the Himalayas are the perfect place for trekking and for some other adventurous activities.
Most of the above formulas are pulled mainly from a few key texts, some of which are in Paul’s introductions, in which he is just starting to formulate his ideas. We need to look at the development of Paul’s thought and particularly tune into his conclusions, which, by the way, agree with those of Jesus, John, James, the writer of Hebrews, etc..
Although it could not have occurred to us on the first reading, a second reading may lead us to ask why Munro opens the story with the movie theater and its owner, since neither play a significant role in the remainder of the story. This seems to ignore Poe’s injunction: “In the whole composition there should be no word written, of which the tendency, direct or indirect, is not to the one pre-established design.” It also seems to ignore Chekhov’s advice: "If you say in the first chapter that there is a rifle hanging on the wall, in the second or third chapter it absolutely must go off.”
The Western Union money transfer is apparently one of the least secure means on the planet to transfer funds, so it is often used in romance scams, business scams and “help me” scams of this type. Apparently Western Union will hand over the cash to anyone with what appears to be a proper photo ID.
As members of our organizations we make many promises - we promise to go to meetings, be on committees, go to events, raise money.... the list goes on and on. But, the most important promise we make is that of our Ritual. No matter our organization, when we go through our initiation rite we are given an expectation - one set forth by our founders - and challenged to live our lives in the path they've laid out.
Of recent love triangle fame is, of course, the Twilight series. Which is funny since this is a triangle that isn’t a triangle. Yes, I read them, and yes, I’ve seen the movies. Yes, I think it’s awful. It’s like a train wreck, I can’t look
OUAS challenge for this month is to journal about the thinsg we look forward in December, and one of them is the picking of the Christmas tree. This year we found some funky ones, real ones painted in cool colors, I almost couldn't resist, they were so pretty. We ended up picking an 8 footer that was perfect to hold our long collection of ornaments, so here it is!
Because Kaylin can't show up to my house without sweets. Just like Taylor can't go anywhere without Pinot Grigio. And Emily, bless her heart, knows not to knock on my door without Mr. Noir.
“Full dress” was the most formal kind of dress in a Regency Lady’s wardrobe. Full dress was worn for the most formal occasions — evening concerts and card parties, soirees, balls, and court occasions. “Evening dress” referred to outfits suitable only at evening events, but was a specific subset of “full dress”.
White subway tiles with dark grout
If you are thinking Where Can I Get One?? Join the club. To find out I called Richard who is out in L.A with the British Fashion Council presenting at the London Showrooms and he told me the bag is coming in white, orange, blue and black leather and Net-A-Porter have the exclusive on it. Will update further when I get retail price and in-stock date.
despite all this, the gym is closing because… Well, presumably because of money. Or lack thereof. But this is what I really don’t understand. Apparently we needed twenty more members to go into profit. Just twenty bodies. Yet 1610 (yeah, I know, isn’t it such a stupid name? Can a number even be a name??) barely advertised the facility and seemed uninterested in encouraging more people. Not long ago I wrote a long email to them suggesting ideas for boosting membership (family memberships, links with GP surgery, better marketing, etc. etc.) – I never received a reply.
Forever Young is fucking amazing. Seriously, that should be the colour description on the Sportsgirl website. It's a bright ass hot pink that borders on neon, and is an absolute stunner over light, bright and dark pink lipsticks. I love this one so much that I bought 2 backups!
And you keep it just for fun, for a laugh ha-ha-ha
We all know that, right?
You can also go into any of your favorite bookstores and request a copy of the book if they don’t carry it. You’ll need the ISBN #: 978-0-9845848-0-2
a huge unsaying, it fell, torn language; settled,
A hand that's brushed in a careless moment,
all he did was tell me to go lay down.
A track mark half erased
He was a good lad, full of beans, lanky, like me and my mum and dad even had him round for tea once (where he told me how to break double glazing if I ever needed to escape from a fire in my house), so he must have been alright.
“I love you, Ted,” Melissa breathed admiringly.
The doubts about the market appeal and competitiveness of electric cars aired by technologists and engineers at the SAE conference highlight the increasing tensions between Washington and Detroit over fuel economy and environmental regulation. Those tensions were largely sublimated during the past several years as the federal government poured billions of dollars into bailouts of GM and Chrysler and extended low-cost loans to Ford to subsidize development of advanced-technology vehicles, including electric cars.
Dulltown, Europe: Today’s dictionary word is ‘plus-fours’ – baggy knickerbockers.
pinch garlic powder
Revolution 2020 begins with a conceited prologue, where Bhagat is visiting GangaTech College in Varanasi, India. There he meets Gopal, the 26-year-old director of the college, who then becomes the protagonist of our story. He relates his life story to Bhagat, and thus begins a reader’s torturous experience as he makes his way through this implausibly stupid book.
Ok...most people have probably seen the entire anime (If you haven't it's only 12 episodes...and if you like innuendo and dirty nasty sexual jokes, this show is for you)
It's sickening
BUT with Attachment Parenting, it is different and maybe it has nothing to do with AP, other than I want to nurture him and listen to HIS needs/wants.
The greyhound turned and looked at Moon with a deepness in its eyes -
That's a good thing huh?
City of Saints and Madmen by Jeff VanderMeer - I've had VanderMeer's big book of Ambergris sitting around for years and it was also on my list of try to read from my shelf this year. Check. With all my New Weird reading this year it was high time I delved into VanderMeer's world of mushroom men and odd occurrences. Overall, this is a very, very strange book with not only content, but style as VanderMeer never sticks to one for long. Everything from a fairly straight forward lovelorn narrative to a history of the city with extensive footnotes and than pamphlet type chapters showcasing various aspects of the city of Ambergris. Highly recommended, but not for those who don't like a challenge.
The Rose of Windslow Street by Elizabeth Camden
Some reputable legal scholars, like Akhil Reed Amar of Yale Law School, have made similar historical arguments. But in Skousen's view, the implications of this history are radical: Skousen would encourage the states today to require "universally accepted" religious teachings in public schools, as long as they don't favor one denomination over another. ...
But on Sunday we were there to cheer all the runners on, many of whom looked particularly pained and tired this time around. It can’t have been for lack of support from the 2.5 million spectators and 137 bands along the course. Although it was a beautiful clear day, the cutting wind was evil. The NY Marathon is the largest and most complex in the world, crossing all five boroughs (starting on Staten Island and traversing Brooklyn, Queens, The Bronx, and ending finally on Manhattan).
The week ended up going by quickly over all, and was a lot of fun. We had a BUNCH of sessions on teaching ESL, spiritual discussions, discussions regarding how to deal with conflicts and culture shock, and soooo many more things. It was a lot of information to take in in a single week! Like I said, my team has had a great bonding experience! We competed in a scavenger on Saturday (in which we tied for first place) and preformed in the talent show that night (we did a remix of “Seasons of Love”). It has really been a blast getting the privilege of waking up each morning and worshiping with a bunch of believers, with the same goal in mind: GO.
It then began a full scale investigation, and banned the four from holding office.
Like I said. Pretty dull.
This week, the sergeant said it was “better for him” not to speak to us. He requested that we didn’t use his name and wouldn’t elaborate on the threats against him.
When he returned to the table the mom and young toddler went for their dinners while the dad remained behind with the older kids. Nothing unusual here, right?
Level 18: STR: +54, Increases your attack speed.
A tiny knock at the door and then;
If the publisher fails to fulfill the obligation of due care in respect of the authorization, the source and signature of manuscript, the content of the publication it edits and other relevant factors for its publishing, the publisher shall bear corresponding liabilities of compensation therefor according to Article 48 of the Copyright Law.
Anime – Pressure Mounting
“C’mon back in an’ thaw your toes.
2 tsp grated lemon zest
Source: around my french table by Dorie Greenspan
But it was too late. Nick had already passed from innocence to experience whether he knew it or not- and his father was unable to stop it- just as I was unable to stop my daughter from hearing that foul mouth across the street- and just like I will never be able to stop my daughter from passing from innocence to experience- it was for me as it was for Nick’s father as it is and was for every father- real or fiction- alive or dead- beyond our control.
Kate Forsyth first appeared on this blog a couple of years ago when I reviewed her enchanting children's fantasy 'The Puzzle Ring'. I'm very pleased to welcome her back this week, and to review her latest book - for adults this time - 'Bitter Greens'. It's a fabulous mix of history, fantasy and fiction: suitably, as its heroine is a storyteller par excellence, the French writer Mademoiselle Charlotte-Rose de Caumont de la Force (1654-1724), best known as the author of the fairytale ‘Persinette’ (1698), which later was adopted by the Brothers Grimm as the famous ‘Rapunzel’.
We joked and jested so delightfully, beautified by his smile.
a dream within a dream,
So, prompted by a discussion on The Hopry, a Midwest beer blog, I offer my thoughts on the necessary ingredients for a well-stocked beer fridge. Individual taste may differ, but I think these guidelines are pretty solid:
“No way, no way, no way is that. How could it be self defense? Why would you bring a gun to work? I don’t believe Nassar ever has seen a gun in his life,” said Alkattan’s friend, Samira Bantalav.
Wow. It's been almost three weeks since I have made an entry here and I feel really bad about it. I would love to tell you it's for some exciting reason, but the fact is that I have had to do work type stuff. Eww! I know, huh? Sadly, I wasn't able to work on my dollhouse for all this time..... well, maybe a few minutes here and there, but no REAL work.
June was a cloudy, abysmal month, weather wise, to say nothing of a month that saw inflation to a degree that the political entities in power are beginning to question whether they will still be around after the economy corrects itself. (Hannes Hólmsteinn Gissurarson, in the past an Independence Party pundit, contacted for this article by the Grapevine mentioned, casually, that, “I am not sure that the governing parties will win,” a sensible comment from a sensible man, except Gissurarson rarely concedes any hint that the Independence Party won’t be in power for eternity.)
The great potential irony of the 2006 Texas governor's race is Rick Perry emerging victorious despite a majority of people voting against him. That's how it's shaping up with Kinky Friedman, Grandma Strayhorn and that other guy on the ballot.
Seems like everything we had is already gone
SOMEHOW Shu ignores gravity and gets back up to Gai’s level despite absolutely blasting past him, and manages to end up tenderly embracing him while Gai’s chest glows and they slowly drift down to the ground and FUCK I DUNNO. They have a moment and Gai seems to be back to his old self and inspirational and friendly and shit because lolcliché.
BEER AND THE WORKER
Although Doodling and Flidderbugs are currently only available as ebooks Jonathan tells me that an Australian book chain has taken an interest in self-published authors and intends to promote both the ebooks and paperback versions thereof and so there, at least, you should be able to get your hand on a real book if you still haven’t succumbed to the pressure to buy a Kindle.
What would you do if there would be no official Thing-a-day platform in 2013?
Supporters' Player of the Year - Clint Hill
Merry Christmas, From Texas!
Love God, love you
Here is the first official post for my restaurant review section. Previously I had shared meals from the places I traveled, but after thinking about it I decided to share what Los Angeles had to offer as well. The other week I went out to a fancy Japanese dinner near my house. N/Naka is devoted to picking the freshest in season ingredients and creating a 10 course kaiseki menu. Kaiseki is a traditional multicourse Japanese dinner which show off a variety of cooking techniques as well as the cooks artistry. The restaurant itself is a small intimate modern space that probably only seats about 25 people. It seemed like everyone there was on a “hot date” or celebrating a special occasion.
I'm here to share a little christmas card I've made - another one! It's using the cute little Tiny Tags set from Papertrey, I thought I would use lots of the different shapes with it. I haven't linked to all of the words as they're from 6 different stamps set and I thought it would be a bit tedious making a note of them! If you're curious to know about one, just let me know in the comments and I'll find out for you. Also, I'm not sure where the glitter paper was from, Create & Craft maybe...?
Time to vacate the Dante Chamber
Philip James Frost and Gary McMillan. Two artists that sit at either end of spectrum. While Frost’s work obliterates the narrative with his aggressive approach to mark making, colour use and grime pop. McMillan creates intensely detailed realistic paintings that hold an unsettling tension that you just cant seem to place. A real stillness.
The device remains the deadliest weapon in the Taliban's arsenal. It is effective on a psychological level, as well as causing deaths and severe injury, and is relatively cheap and simple to manufacture.
Equity Balance @ 01/31/2011: $3,052.89
Oh, maybe because this is just an excuse? It's all just bullshit to hide their bigotry behind?
Hurting and broken.
And while I didn't go out on Black Friday, I'd love to hear what all you found for good deals! I can live vicariously through you, so do tell.
This sounds fun for all the little ladies out there. On Saturday March 13, 2010, Toys R Us will be having a Barbie Mermaid Party to celebrate the release of "A Mermaid Tale." It says their will be activities for kids and there is also a $2 off coupon to buy the DVD. March 13th Noon-2pm.
THE LOCKS ON THE PONT
More impressions of Jesus Lizard:
It's time for the cloth diaper giveaway roundup! Peruse the list of cloth diaper/accessory/baby wearing giveaways I've found, and enter what you like!
I have gone a little mad this month with my project for MHC. I'll share a little sneak peak with you as I'm hopeless at keeping things to myself. LOL.
Egypt 54 Lebanon 13 Turkey 11
As the next election approaches, people keep asking what must be done to restore our economy, to restore peace, to restore the gleam and pride of America… The answers are right here people, in black and white. It comes down to whether we as a nation are too proud to listen to them, and heed their direction.
The sky is airbrushed B41. The roof is cool grays blended with 0 and a tiny hint of BV23 and Y00.
David Jay embraces the everyday, personal, true happenings of life, and through his photographs, beautifully portrays every woman’s unique situation. As part of The SCAR Project, I can “just be me”. No covering up or masking the truth. No pretending that everything is fine.
John didn’t answer he kept writing his hand swirling across the page with a graceful elegance. Dr Logan fought the urge to reach out and take the pencil from his hand. It was never wise to reach out and touch a patient unless absolutely necessary. The simple act of placing your hand on someones shoulder could get your finger bitten off. John had never shown any violent tendencies but that didn’t mean they weren’t there.
Also, recruitment pros can read through the fluff so even though your resume reads “Organized Retail Crime Specialist,” we see “Security Guard” or “Mall Cop,” and it gives the impression that you are trying way to hard and probably don’t have the concrete skill sets I’m looking for.
Use code BLOGGER at checkout.
There is so much beauty in this world that people simply look past or dont look at all...There are wild jungles, Animals still not seen by man, diffrent communitys, all races of people, A simple sunset...
Caregiving often means financial disaster for the person giving it.
Adoptive families from China will no doubt be interested in knowing what his book says about his work to bring unwanted babies into China's orphanages in order for them to be adopted internationally. While he is quite outspoken in private conversations and correspondence about the destination of most of the children he has supposedly rescued, the book is almost completely silent about his interactions with China's orphanages. He does recount one story involving Yoda, his protective intelligence officer, and an orphanage in Chongqing Municipality. Yoda learned that this unnamed orphanage had been accepting infant girls, only to turn around and sell them to sex traders, who would apparently raise the children for 15 years before using them in the sex trade. One can of course question the financial and logistical logic behind such scheme, but what is interesting to read in Jim's book is how Yoda handled it (remembering that Yoda is all powerful):
Vocabulary should be learnt in context, not through memorising dictionaries. This approach is good for the first one hundred words, but grammar is best learnt by seeing examples and imitating.
The genocide of the 1890,s started when Sultan Abdul Hamid II ordered massacres against the Armenians – the largest Christian minority culture in the Anatolian part of the Ottoman Empire. It took the lives of about two hundred thousand Armenians (The Burning Tigris, Preface - Pg xvi).
(Note* – However, it is important to note that this location was extremely far from Jerusalem, and Yeshua & his Disciples would have been in Jerusalem for the Feast of Sukkot (Tabernacles), as it is one of three Pilgrimage feasts set forth in Leviticus 23, thereby making Mt. Hermon an unlikely reality for the place of Transfiguration)
less-than-three
This is bad news for the economy. If the ADP report is seconded by the Labor Department’s June jobs report, it means that the private sector — which is the engine of growth in this economy, lest we’ve forgotten that, amid all of our various government stimulus programs and subsides — is refusing to add jobs. That means employers are not comfortable enough with their prospects to hire.
Star Trek 2, aka The Wrath of Kahn, (not the new J.J. Abrams version in the works, which should be amazing) centers around the Genesis Device, a ‘weapon’ that destroys everything in a given area and forms a new planet. At the end of the movie the weapon is fired and the battered crew of the Enterprise witnesses the birth of the gensis planet.
There have also been statements made that a toy submarine made of materials at hand in the 1930s with a monster's-head superstructure would be top-heavy and tip over rather than stay afloat. A rather more peculiar problem is that there seems to have been no model he could have copied to look like the 'Sea Monster' in the photo: I have not seen any previous Plesiosaur reconstructions that actually match it. After the image of the photo was established in the imagination of the public, it seemed obvious to say that "I made a model of how the Loch Ness Monster looked" but it was not possible to say that before hand!
A delicacy from Lombok, the touching island east of Bali. Existing is fictional from a mixture of minced meat ( beef, chicken, or fish ), shredded coconut meat, and spices. The concoction therefrom being wrapped around a point and grilled over slate.
What is “Self-awareness,” other than being aware of who you are? From the book, “a well-developed self-awareness makes you more effective in your relationships, your job, and every aspect of your life….you are more aware of how you relate to the rest of the world and how the rest of the world relates to you….by becoming self-aware, you gain insight into why things happen to you the way they do–and how you can increse the chances of creating circumstances favorable to success.”
Therefore, speak to them of Judah and them of Jerusalem, and say, Behold I prepare a calamity for you and think evil against you; let each of you, then, turn from his evil way and make your deeds good.” This saying we may apply to ourselves as though it had been spoken to us, for God devises an evil against us because of our wickedness and certainly prepares the Turk against us, as He says also in Psalm 7:12, “If a man turn not, he hath whetted his sword and stretched his bow, and aimed it, and laid a deadly bolt in it.”
This was an event organised by the AMICIgar club of Naples and Avellino, in Italy. For the non-italians amongst you, the name of the club is a play on the words "amici" (friends") and cigar... The event was in Pozzuoli, by Naples, in Villa Habiba on 17th and 18th June. It was truly an amazing weekend, filled with great cigars, awesome food and fantastic people!
While no major areas of precipitation are forecast through Friday night as it appears now, with the increased temperatures, we’re in a rather summer-like pattern. As we know from the past, sometimes in the summer an isolated storm or two will pop up from time to time in the afternoon. Therefore, we can’t rule out one of these on any given day. Other than that – ENJOY THIS!
In addition to teaching us what to do when evaluating a claim to knowledge, any good baloney detection kit must also teach us what not to do. It helps us recognize the most common and perilous fallacies of logic and rhetoric. Many good examples can be found in religion and politics, because their practitioners are so often obliged to justify two contradictory propositions.
Okay this I started writing this a couple days ago, but now I've finished it. haha.
Two arguments Republicans make about this don't many any sense to me. The first is that letting the tax cuts expire on the richest 1% would hurt the "job-creators", and therefore would be detrimental to our efforts at stimulating the economy and creating jobs. My issue with this, as discussed in a previous post, is that this has proven to be demonstrably false. The so-called job-creators have NOT been creating jobs since these tax cuts have gone into affect, and have in fact been continually whining in an effort to get the rate even lower. The second argument is that we as a society should not continue to "feed" the government more and more money over time, because we're just creating a bloated system that doesn't actually use our money wisely. The problem with this argument is that operating costs increase over time; therefore it stands to reason that it would cost more money to run the government than it did twenty years ago - or even ten years ago. But somehow the Republicans believe that we can go back to some magical government expenditure amount that we had at some magical time when everything worked out perfectly. The problem is that there was never a time, and there is no magic number. Our government costs what our government costs. Should we eliminate or modify programs that dont' work...certainly. Should we try to eliminate waste wherever we can...of course (we could start by getting rid of congressional pensions and lifetime healthcare benefits). But overall, any business person has to admit that over time, the cost of operation goes up - that's a simple fact of life.
They’re made from organic cotton and organic soy, and they’re wonderfully soft. I want clothes made from this fabric! These are the tiny 0-3 month size. I have a fair bit of patience for sewing, but not a very good sewing machine, and trying to do hems on the 3-6 month size was bad enough. I decided to just buy the things we’ll need for the first three months. (I’ll be using the same fold-back-cuffs design that these have on anything else I make though!) I’ve bought the nappies/diapers (organic cotton Chinese tri-folds) and some organic hemp burp cloths too, which arrived last week, along with a baby brush & comb, and this giraffe:
One day I decided that it would be nice to have a bouquet that would just stay nice! I really like working with old book pages, and decided that a whole bunch of pinwheels in a vase might just be the thing.
7) My goal is to reduce the diastolic blood pressure to no lower than 85 to 90 mmHg. A systolic blood pressure of about 140 mmHg makes people happy too – however, I do not routinely lower systolic blood pressure, regardless of the original level, with medications, if that means also reducing the diastolic pressure below 80 mmHg – the risks are too great for more stroke and heart attacks. (Remember, without medications a blood pressure of 110/70 mmHg or lower is ideal.)
Mathew 20:20-28
I haven't sent anything to my mother recently and I thought to make her a little tag/card gift set. I had a picture of the kids that is one of my favorites from last year and I cut it out and layered it onto a chipboard tag. The sentiments are from the Rose Wreath stamp set which is part of the gorgeous seasonal wreath collection from Taylored Expressions and the flowers are from the beautiful stamp set: Rosy Posey.
Today, I want to disappear.
We are concentrating on that last phrase; “all hope that we should be saved was taken away.” It seemed futile but still they were fighting for their lives; doing all possible to lighten the ship, making it more buoyant. They were casting overboard chests, tables, chairs, and even sails, ropes and other necessary tackling. They were desperate.
LUCKMAN FINE ARTS COMPLEX ON FRIDAY APRIL 13TH
Based upon the 1958 BBC television serial of the same name, Quatermass and the Pit is an engaging, albeit scientifically challenged science fiction horror film about the discovery of ancient Martian skeletons and their spacecraft during excavations to expand the London Underground. While skeletal remains put up no resistance, not the same can be said for their mysterious spacecraft which eventually unleashes a power that could destroy the city, or perhaps the earth. Despite the low-budget effects, it remains one of the most suspenseful and frightening of the Hammer Horror films owing to the strong script and respectable performances (Klaus Ming march 2012).
It’s that combination of personal anecdote crossed with ridiculously elaborate punch line that makes John Safran so fantastic. There’s just something about the lengths John’s willing to go to that put him a class above The Chaser boys and their naff “pranks” involving the Crazy Warehouse guy. In Vs. God John didn’t just ponder whether as a Jew he’d be allowed to join the KKK he actually flew to America and tried to sign up. That’s dedication to comedy, and in the second sequence of the night John proves yet again the lengths he’s willing to go to get a laugh and make a point.
So if you enjoy beautiful color work, struggle with a bit of OCD, and appreciate equal parts whimsy and the sublime I would recommend ordering your copy today, I did.
Party activist Alan Coles said, "People were genuinely pleased to see us out and about. We got to speak to a fair number of local folk, many of whom have already pledged to vote for us next year in the Shropshire council elections."
(Three plaintiffs in that case remain; two are entities owned by Henry Weinstein, who has not yet settled in the pending condemnation case but has agreed to vacate his property in exchange for an advance payment. He surely would be required to drop other litigation if he settles.)
Who knows, they might be right. It all makes sense, certainly in this crazy corner of the world. But I wish our leaders and security experts would ratchet the sound down and stop criticizing each other in public. Let’s think before we give moral succour to the enemy.
- he is saying 'bye bye' 'no' 'momma' 'uh-oh' 'ball'
We ended up going to a BBQ at Stephen's house with his parents, his sister and brother-in-law, and his brother and sister-in-law, then his aunt and uncle and everyones' kids. It was a really great time, and everyone's really accepting of the boys and I. I love the sense of family I get from them. It's so completely the opposite from my family that, honestly, I usually end up spending more time with them than my own.
I don't know about you, but I do this at least once a week. I laughed when I saw it and wondered if I was the only one who does this! Do you? There should also be one that says "I forgot about the load in the washer and it sat there for 2 days and got weird smelling so I poured more soap in and started it again. On HOT." :)
Growing up, there were a lot of British detective mysteries and quite of few of the Brett Halliday/Mike Shane type books around the place. My grandparents also had some bookshelves which I raided as often as I visited. Detective fiction was a big influence in my thinking. I wanted to be like Archie Goodwin, Nero Wolfe’s legman.
Florida State University has been drying drops of beverages on glass slides; allowing them to dry out into clusters of crystals and then passing light through them as they take a look through a microscope. The affect is a kaleidoscope of color.
Attention Walmart shoplifters: The old bag-in-the-purse trick doesn’t always work.
And one would also think stories like the one below would stir people to action but that is not the case. South Africans are an apathetic lot. Even with the world's worst crime figures, a recent Anti Crime March attracted just 5000 people.
She went to him.
